Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
PROVISIONAL DRIVER LICENSE TESTING
SECTION 1.  ORS 807.065 is amended to read:
807.065. (1) The Department of Transportation may not issue a  driver license to a person who
is under 18 years of age unless the person:
(a) Complies with the requirements of ORS 807.040 and 807.066;
(b) Has had, for  at least six months prior to application for the license, an instruction driver
permit issued under ORS 807.280 or the equivalent of an instruction driver permit issued by  another
state of the United States or by the District of Columbia;
(c) Certifies to the  department that the person has had at least 50 hours of driving experience
during which the person  was supervised by a person at least 21 years of age who has had a valid
driver license for at least three years; and
(d) Completes a traffic safety education course that meets standards  developed by the depart-
ment under ORS 336.802. In lieu  of completion of a traffic safety education course, a person may
certify to the department that  the person has had at least 50 hours of driving experience during
which the person was supervised by a person at least  21 years of age who has had a valid driver
license for at least three  years, in addition to the 50 hours required by paragraph (c) of this sub-
section.
(2) A person under 18 years of age need not  comply with the requirements of subsection (1)(b),
(c) and (d) of this section if the person has been  issued a driver license by another state and sur-
renders that license in order to get an Oregon license.
[(3) If the person takes but does not  pass a test that consists of an actual demonstration of driving
ability under ORS 807.070, the department may not allow the person to perform  the demonstration
again until the  person has had an instruction permit issued pursuant to ORS 807.280 for a period of
not less than one month. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 1
[(4)] (3) A driver license issued pursuant to this section shall be a provisional driver license.
[(5)] (4)  The department shall prominently identify each driver license issued pursuant to this
section as a provisional driver license.
SELF-SERVE KIOSKS
SECTION 2.  ORS 802.600 is amended to read:
802.600. (1) The Department of Transportation may enter into an agreement with any qualified
provider to transact on behalf of the department the following functions of the department:
(a) Any vehicle-related transaction for which the department is responsible.
(b) Processing of fees or taxes for  a vehicle-related transaction for which the department is re-
sponsible.
(c) Any driver-related transaction for which the department is responsible.
(d) Processing of fees or taxes for a driver-related transaction  for which the department
is responsible.
[(c)] (e)  Written and skills testing for driver licenses and  permits, including commercial driver
licenses.
(2) An agreement described in subsection (1) of this section  may be in any form and may contain
any provisions that the department determines to be in the best interests of the public and conven-
ient for the department,  including but not necessarily limited to provisions that allow the depart-
ment to:
(a) Ensure product quality control.
(b) Audit activities of the qualified provider entering into the agreement  to ensure compliance
with the agreement.
(c) Impose sanctions on a qualified provider for violation of the agreement.
(3) A qualified provider authorized to transact business for  the department under this section,
including but not limited to a qualified provider who transacts business under contract  with an
integrator, may charge a fee for the services provided.  Fees authorized under this subsection are in
addition to any charges or fees that the department is authorized by statute to collect for  the
transaction.
(4)(a) The department may adopt such rules as are necessary  to carry out the provisions of this
section, including but not limited to rules that:
(A) Specify criteria for eligibility of a qualified  provider to enter into an agreement with the
department under this section.
(B) Specify the manner in which fees authorized by this section will be collected  and establish
any notification the qualified provider is required to give the public about the fees.
(C) Require a bond  in an amount determined by the department from a qualified provider acting
under an agreement described in this section.
(D) Prohibit disclosure of personal information from driver or vehicle records except in  accord-
ance with applicable laws.
(b) The department may not adopt rules establishing the amount of  a fee to be charged by a
qualified provider acting under this section.
(c) Rules adopted under this subsection  shall be developed in consultation with persons who
might enter into agreements with the department under this section, including  but not limited to
integrators and vehicle dealers.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” means a person who  enters into a contract with the Department of Transpor-
tation:
(A) To provide information  and supplies to a qualified provider who transacts business for the
department under an agreement described in this section; and
(B) To collect  moneys due from qualified providers who transact the business and remit the
moneys to the department.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 2
(b) “Qualified provider” means:
(A) Community college operated under ORS chapter 341;
(B) Education service district; or
(C) Person who is not an employee of the department, including but  not limited to an integrator.
EXPANSION OF VALID WITHOUT PHOTO PROGRAM FOR
MILITARY FAMILIES
SECTION 3.
 ORS 807.110 is amended to read:
807.110. (1) A driver license issued by the  Department of Transportation shall contain all of the
following:
(a) The distinguishing number assigned to the person issued  the driver license by the depart-
ment.
(b) For the purpose of identification, a brief  description of the person to whom the driver license
is issued.
(c) The full legal name of the person to whom the driver license is  issued, except that the de-
partment may limit the number of characters displayed on the driver license.
(d) The date of birth and sex of the person to whom the driver license is issued.
(e) Except as provided for corrections officers in  ORS 802.253, eligible employees in ORS 802.250
or Address Confidentiality Program participants in ORS 192.846, the residence address  of the person
to whom the driver license is issued.
(f) Upon request of the person to whom the  driver license is issued, the fact that the person is
an anatomical donor.
(g) Upon request of the person to whom the driver license is issued and presentation  of proof,
as determined by the department, the fact that the person is a veteran, as defined in ORS 408.225.
(h) Upon order of the juvenile court, the fact that the person to whom the  driver license is is-
sued is an emancipated minor.
(i) Except as otherwise provided  in subsection (2) of this section, a photograph described in this
paragraph. A photograph required under this paragraph shall:
(A) Be a full-faced[ , color ] photograph of the person to whom the driver license is issued;
(B) Be of a size approved by the department; and
(C) Be taken at the time of  application for issuance of the driver license whether the application
is for an original  driver license, replacement of a driver license under ORS 807.160 or renewal of
a driver license  under ORS 807.150, except that the department, by rule, may allow the applicant
to use a photograph already on file with the department.
(j) The class of driver license issued and any endorsements granted.
(k) The signature of the person to whom the driver license is issued.
(L) If the driver license is not a Real ID, a design differentiating it from a Real ID.
(m) Upon request of the  person to whom the driver license is issued, the fact that the person
is deaf or hard of hearing.
(2) The department may issue  a valid driver license, other than a commercial driver license,
without a photograph to an applicant:
(a) Who objects on religious grounds;
(b) Who objects because of the applicant’s facial disfigurement; or
(c) Who is stationed outside of  this state while serving in the active military service in the
Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard  or  who is the spouse or dependent of
such an individual, and the department does not have an acceptable photograph  of the applicant,
as determined by the department by rule. This  paragraph applies to an applicant who is renewing
or replacing a driver license.
(3) A limited term driver license or a limited term commercial driver  license issued under ORS
807.730 shall indicate:
(a) That it is a limited term driver license; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 3
(b) The date on which the limited term driver license expires.
(4) The department shall use security procedures, processes  and materials in the preparation,
manufacture and  issuance of any driver license that prohibit as nearly as possible anyone’s ability
to alter, counterfeit, duplicate or modify the driver license without ready detection.  The security
features used in the production of the driver licenses shall provide for:
(a) The authentication of a genuine document in a reasonable time; and
(b) The production of the driver  license only by equipment that requires verification of the
identity of the operator of the equipment before a driver license may be produced.
RETURN OF SUSPENDED, REVOKED OR CANCELED
DRIVER LICENSES
SECTION 4.
 ORS 809.500 is amended to read:
809.500. (1) A person  commits the offense of failure to return a suspended, revoked or canceled
license if the person has driving privileges suspended , revoked or canceled  and  the person fails to
immediately return to the Department of Transportation any license or  driver permit issued by the
department.
(2) If any person fails to return a license  or driver permit on suspension, revocation or cancel-
lation of the person’s driving privileges, the department may request any peace officer  to secure
possession thereof and return it to the department.
(3) The offense described in this section, failure to return a suspended, revoked or canceled  li-
cense, is a Class C misdemeanor.
SECTION 5. The amendments to ORS 809.500 by section 4 of this  2025 Act apply to of-
fenses committed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
FALSE SWEARING
SECTION 6.  ORS 807.520 is amended to read:
807.520. (1) A person commits the offense of false swearing to receive a driver license if the
person:
(a) Makes any false affidavit or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter required  to
be sworn to or affirmed in the process of  applying for, receiving and holding a driver license or
driver permit under the vehicle code ;[.]
(b) Makes any false affidavit or knowingly swears or affirms falsely to any matter  re-
quired to be sworn or affirmed in the support of another  person’s application for receiving
and holding a driver license or driver permit under the vehicle code; or
(c) Takes any test related to the issuance of a driver license or driver permit on behalf
of another applicant for a driver license or driver permit, or  otherwise knowingly commits
fraud in assisting another person in passing  any test related to the issuance of a driver li-
cense or driver permit.
(2) The offense described in this section, false swearing to receive a  driver license, is a Class
A misdemeanor.
SECTION 7. The amendments to ORS 807.520 by section 6 of this  2025 Act apply to of-
fenses committed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
HARDSHIP PERMITS
SECTION 8.  ORS 807.240 is amended to read:
807.240. The Department of  Transportation shall provide for issuance of hardship driver permits
in a manner consistent with this section. A hardship driver permit grants the driving  privileges
provided in this section or under the permit. Except as otherwise provided in this section,  a hard-
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 4
ship driver permit is subject to the fees, provisions, conditions, prohibitions and penalties applicable
to a license. The following apply to a hardship driver permit:
(1) The department may [ only] issue a permit to a person :
(a) Whose driving privileges  under the vehicle code have been suspended, or revoked under ORS
809.600 as a habitual offender ; or
(b)(A) Who is eligible for reinstatement of driving privileges;
(B) Who is required to provide proof of treatment to the department under ORS  813.022;
and
(C) Who is required by law to install  and use an ignition interlock device on any vehicle
the person operates .
(2) Except as provided in this section  and ORS 813.520, the department may reinstate the priv-
ilege to operate a motor vehicle of  any person whose license to operate a motor vehicle has been
suspended, or revoked under ORS 809.600 as a habitual offender, by  issuing the person a hardship
permit.
(3) To qualify for a hardship permit, a person must do all of the following:
(a) The person must  submit to the department an application for the permit that demonstrates
the person’s need for the permit.
(b) The person must present satisfactory evidence, as determined by the department by rule:
(A) That the person must operate a motor vehicle as a requisite of the  person’s occupation or
employment;
(B) That the person must operate a motor vehicle to seek employment or to get to or from a
place of employment;
(C) That the person must operate a motor  vehicle to get to or from an alcohol or drug treatment
or rehabilitation program;
(D) That the person or a member  of the person’s immediate family requires medical treatment
on a regular basis and that  the person must operate a motor vehicle in order that the treatment
may be obtained;
(E) That the person must operate a motor vehicle to get to or from a gambling  addiction treat-
ment program; or
(F) That the person must operate a motor vehicle to  provide necessary services to the person
or to a member of the person’s family. The  department shall determine by rule what constitutes
necessary services for purposes of this subparagraph. The rule shall include as necessary  services,
but need not be limited to, grocery shopping, driving the person or  the person’s children to school,
driving to medical appointments and caring for elderly family members.
(c) If the person is applying for a permit because the person or a member of the person’s  im-
mediate family  requires medical treatment on a regular basis, the person must present, in addition
to any evidence required by the department under paragraph (b) of this subsection, a statement
signed by a licensed physician or licensed nurse practitioner that indicates that the  person or a
member of the person’s immediate family requires medical treatment on a regular basis.
(d) The  person must show that the person is not incompetent to drive nor a habitual incompe-
tent, reckless or criminally negligent driver as established by the person’s driving record in this or
any other jurisdiction.
(e) The person must make a future responsibility filing.
(f) The person must  submit any other information the department may require for purposes of
determining whether the person qualifies under this section and ORS 813.520.
(4) If the department finds that the person meets  the requirements of this section and any ap-
plicable requirements under ORS 813.520, the  department may issue the person a hardship permit,
valid for the duration of the suspension or revocation or for  a shorter period of time established by
the department unless sooner suspended or revoked under this section. If  the department issues the
permit for a period shorter  than the suspension or revocation period, renewal of the permit shall
be on such terms and conditions as the department may require. The permit:
(a) Shall limit the holder to operation of a motor vehicle only during specified times.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 5
(b) May bear other reasonable limitations relating to the hardship permit or  the operation of a
motor vehicle that the department deems proper or necessary. The limitations may  include any
limitation, condition or requirement. Violation of a limitation  is punishable as provided by ORS
811.175 or 811.182.
(5) The department, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of any violation of the limitations  of
a permit issued under this section, may suspend or revoke the hardship permit.
(6) The fee charged for application  or issuance of a hardship driver permit is the hardship driver
permit application fee under ORS 807.370. The department may not refund  the fee if the application
is denied or if the  driver permit is suspended or revoked. The fee upon renewal of the driver permit
is the same fee as that charged for renewal of a license. The application fee charged under this
subsection is in addition to any fee charged for  reinstatement of driving privileges under ORS
807.370.
(7) The department may issue a permit granting the same driving privileges as those suspended
or revoked or may issue  a permit granting fewer driving privileges, as the department determines
necessary to assure safe operation of motor vehicles by the permit holder.
(8) The department may not issue a hardship permit to a person:
(a) Whose driver license or driver permit is suspended pursuant to ORS 25.750 to 25.783;
(b) Whose driving privileges are suspended pursuant to ORS 809.280 (2);
(c) That authorizes the person to operate a commercial motor vehicle;
(d) Whose suspension of driving privileges is based on a second or subsequent  conviction of
driving while under the influence of intoxicants  in violation of ORS 813.010 or the statutory
counterpart to ORS 813.010 in another jurisdiction and the suspension  period is determined by ORS
809.428 (2)(b) or (c);
(e) Whose driving privileges are suspended  for a conviction of assault in the second, third or
fourth degree if the person, within 10 years preceding application for the  permit, has been convicted
of:
(A) Any degree of murder, manslaughter, criminally negligent  homicide or assault resulting from
the operation of a motor vehicle;
(B) Reckless driving, as defined in ORS 811.140;
(C) Driving while under the influence of intoxicants, as defined in ORS 813.010;
(D) Failure to perform the duties of a driver involved in a collision, as described in  ORS 811.700
or 811.705;
(E) Criminal driving while suspended or revoked, as defined in ORS 811.182;
(F) Fleeing or attempting to elude a police officer, as defined in ORS 811.540;
(G) Aggravated vehicular homicide, as defined in ORS 163.149; or
(H) Aggravated driving while suspended or revoked, as defined in ORS 163.196; or
(f) Whose driving privileges are  suspended for a conviction of assault in the second, third or
fourth degree:
(A) For a period of four years  from the date the department suspends driving privileges if the
person’s driving privileges  are suspended for conviction of assault in the second degree and the
person was not incarcerated for that conviction.
(B) For a period of four years from the  date the person is released from incarceration for the
conviction if the person’s driving privileges are suspended for conviction of assault  in the second
degree and the person was incarcerated for that conviction.
(C) For a period of two years from the date the department suspends driving privileges  if the
person’s driving privileges  are suspended for conviction of assault in the third degree and the person
was not incarcerated for that conviction.
(D) For a period of two  years from the date the person is released from incarceration for the
conviction if the person’s driving  privileges are suspended for conviction of assault in the third de-
gree and the person was incarcerated for that conviction.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 6
(E) For a period of six months from the date the department suspends driving privileges if the
person’s driving privileges are suspended for conviction of  assault in the fourth degree and the
person is not incarcerated for that conviction.
(F) For a  period of six months from the date the person is released from incarceration for the
conviction if the  person’s driving privileges are suspended for conviction of assault in the fourth
degree and the person was incarcerated for that conviction.
(9) A  conviction arising out of the same episode as the current suspension is not considered a
conviction for purposes of subsection (8)(e) of this section.
(10) A person’s driving privileges under  a hardship permit are subject to suspension or revoca-
tion if the person does not maintain a good driving record, as defined  by the administrative rules
of the department, during the term of the permit.
PHOTO SHARING WITH OTHER STATES
SECTION 9.  ORS 807.115, as amended by section 4, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
807.115. (1) The Department of  Transportation shall retain a digital image of each photograph
and signature shown on a  driver license under the provisions of ORS 807.110 or an identification
card under ORS 807.400.
(2) The digital images of photographs may not be made  available to anyone other than law
enforcement  officials , [ and] employees of the department acting in an official capacity  or a driver
licensing agency of another jurisdiction .
(3) As used in this section, “law enforcement official” includes a humane special agent as  de-
fined in ORS 181A.345.
SCHOOL TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 10.  ORS 825.415 is amended to read:
825.415. (1) As used  in this section, “school transportation provider” means a school district or
a school district contractor that uses school buses or school activity vehicles for:
(a) The transportation of students or school personnel to or  from school or school-related ac-
tivities; or
(b) Public transportation purposes as provided in ORS 332.427.
(2) Every school transportation provider shall:
(a) Have an in-house drug and alcohol testing program that  meets the federal requirements of
49 C.F.R. part 382; or
(b) Be a member of a  consortium, as defined in 49 C.F.R. 382.107, that provides testing that
meets the federal requirements.
(3) Each calendar year, a school transportation provider  shall certify to the Department of Ed-
ucation that the provider is in compliance with subsection (2) of  this section and, if the provider
belongs to a consortium, shall provide the Department  of Education  with the  names of persons who
operate the consortium.
(4) When a medical review officer  of a school transportation provider’s testing program or of the
consortium the provider belongs to determines that  a positive test result is valid, the officer shall
report the finding to the Department  of Education .
COMMERCIAL DRIVER LICENSES
SECTION 11.
Section 12 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Ve-
hicle Code.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 7
SECTION 12. (1) The Department of Transportation may adopt rules necessary to  ad-
minister regulations promulgated by the Federal Motor Carrier  Safety Administration re-
lated to regulating commercial driving privileges.
(2) If a person is not in compliance with the rules adopted under this section, the de-
partment may deny the issuance  or renewal of commercial driving privileges and may cancel,
suspend or revoke commercial driving privileges.
(3) A person  impacted by a rule adopted under this section is entitled to an administra-
tive review or administrative hearing pursuant to ORS 809.140 and 809.440.
SECTION 13. Section 12 of this 2025 Act applies  to federal regulations adopted on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 14.  ORS 809.400 is amended to read:
809.400. (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, the Department
of Transportation may suspend or revoke the driving privileges of any resident of this state  upon
receiving notice of the conviction of such person  in another jurisdiction of an offense therein that,
if committed in this state, would be grounds for the suspension  or revocation of the driving privi-
leges of the person. A suspension or revocation under this subsection shall be initiated  within 30
days of receipt of notice of the conviction. Violation of  a suspension or revocation imposed under
this subsection shall have the same legal  effects and consequences as it would if the offense com-
mitted in the other jurisdiction had been committed in this jurisdiction.
(b) The department may not suspend or revoke noncommercial driving privileges under this
subsection unless notice of conviction is received within 180 days of the date of the conviction.
(2) The  department may suspend or revoke the driving privileges of any resident of this state
upon receiving notice from another  state, territory, federal possession or district or province of
Canada that the person’s driving privileges in  that jurisdiction have been suspended or revoked.
Violation of the suspension or revocation shall have the same legal effects and consequences as it
would if the suspension or  revocation had been imposed initially in this state upon the same
grounds. The suspension or revocation under  this subsection shall continue until the person sus-
pended or revoked furnishes evidence of any of the following:
(a) Compliance with the law of the other jurisdiction or the  restoration of driving privileges in
that jurisdiction.
(b) That the revocation or suspension in  the other jurisdiction was not under circumstances that
would require the department to suspend or revoke the  driving privileges of the person under the
laws of this state.
(3) A person is entitled to administrative review of a suspension under this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 801.522 is amended to read:
801.522. (1) “Tank vehicle” means a  commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any
liquid or gaseous material within a tank or tanks having an individual rate capacity  of more than
119 gallons and an aggregate rate capacity of 1,000  gallons or more that is either permanently or
temporarily attached to the vehicle or the chassis.
(2) “Tank vehicle” does not include a commercial motor  vehicle transporting an empty storage
container tank  that  is not designed for transportation  that has a rated capacity of 1,000 gallons
or more and that is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer.
PARK MODEL RV VIN INSPECTIONS
SECTION 16.  ORS 803.210 is amended to read:
803.210. (1) The Department of Transportation shall not issue title for a vehicle  described in
subsection (2) of this section unless:
(a) An inspection of the vehicle identification number or  numbers of the vehicle is performed in
accordance with ORS 803.212; and
(b) The fee established under ORS 803.215 is paid to the department for the inspection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 8
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the requirements  of this section apply
to all of the following:
(a) A vehicle from another jurisdiction.
(b) Any assembled or reconstructed vehicle.
(c) Any vehicle if the certificate of title has been or is required to  be submitted to the depart-
ment, or a  person is required to report to the department, under ORS 819.010, 819.012, 819.014 or
819.030.
(d) Any vehicle if the department has received notice that the vehicle has been or will be
wrecked, dismantled[,] or  disassembled [ or substantially altered ] under ORS 819.010 or 822.135.
(e) Replicas.
(f) Other than a racing activity vehicle as defined in ORS 801.404, any  vehicle the department
has reason to  believe was not certified by the original manufacturer as conforming to federal vehicle
standards.
(3) The requirements of this section do not apply to  the following vehicles if the person shown
as the owner  on an out-of-state title for the vehicle applies for an Oregon title in that person’s name:
(a) A rental truck, rental truck tractor or rental trailer that is registered in Oregon  under an
interstate agreement that provides that a portion of the owner’s fleet  is to be registered in each
state in which the fleet operates.
(b) A trailer or semitrailer that has permanent registration.
(4) The requirement to inspect a vehicle identification number or  numbers of the vehicle under
subsection (1) of this section does not  apply to park model [ recreation] recreational  vehicles, as
defined in ORS 803.036 , or former park model recreational vehicles .
VEHICLE APPRAISALS
SECTION 17.
 ORS 819.160 is amended to read:
819.160. (1) Except as otherwise provided by  this section, a person shall have a lien on the ve-
hicle and its contents if the person, at the request of an authority described  under ORS 819.140,
tows any of the following vehicles:
(a) An abandoned vehicle appraised at a value of more than [ $500] $1,000 by  a person who holds
a certificate issued under ORS 819.480.
(b) A vehicle taken into custody under ORS 819.110  or 819.120, unless it is an abandoned vehicle
appraised at a value of [ $500] $1,000 or less by a person who holds a certificate issued under ORS
819.480.
(c) A vehicle left parked or standing in violation of ORS 811.555 or 811.570.
(2) A lien established under this section shall be on the vehicle and its contents for the  just and
reasonable charges for the towing service performed and any storage provided. However, the storage
charge is limited subject to ORS 98.812 (3). A lien described under this section does not attach:
(a) To the contents of any vehicle taken from public property until 15 days after taking the ve-
hicle into custody.
(b) To the contents of any vehicle that is taken into custody  for violation of ORS 811.555 or
811.570.
(3) A person that tows any vehicle at the request of an authority under  ORS 819.110 or 819.120
shall transmit by first class mail with a  certificate of mailing, no later than the third business day
after the vehicle and its contents are placed in storage, written notice, approved by the  authority,
containing information on the procedures necessary to  obtain a hearing under ORS 819.190. The
notice shall be provided to the owner, a person entitled to  possession or any person with an interest
recorded on the title to the vehicle. This  subsection does not apply to a person that tows an aban-
doned vehicle that  is appraised at a value of [ $500] $1,000 or less by a person who holds a certificate
issued under ORS 819.480.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 819.215 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 9
819.215. (1) If an abandoned vehicle is appraised at a value of [ $500] $1,000 or less  by a person
who holds a certificate issued under ORS 819.480, the person that towed the vehicle shall:
(a) Notify the registered  owner and secured parties as provided in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Photograph the vehicle;
(c) Notify the Department of Transportation that the vehicle will be disposed of; and
(d) Unless the vehicle is claimed by a person entitled to possession of it within 15 days of the
date of notice under subsection (3) of  this section, dispose of the vehicle and its contents to a person
who holds a valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110.
(2) The authority that requests towing of an abandoned vehicle  shall provide to the person that
tows the vehicle, at the time of the tow or as soon as  possible thereafter, a written statement that
contains the name and address of the registered  owner of the vehicle, as shown by records of the
department, and the names  and addresses of any persons claiming interests in the vehicle, as shown
by records of the department.
(3) Within 48 hours after the  written statement is provided under subsection (2) of this section
to a person that tows a vehicle, the person must give written notice to the persons  whose names
are furnished in the statement. The 48-hour  period does not include Saturdays, Sundays or holidays.
The notice shall state that a person that is entitled  to possession of the vehicle has 15 days from
the date the notice was mailed to claim the vehicle and that if the vehicle is not claimed, it  will
be disposed of as provided in this section.
(4) If  the authority that requests towing of an abandoned vehicle does not provide to the person
that tows the vehicle the written statement within 48 hours after the vehicle is  towed, the person
may dispose of the vehicle as provided in ORS 819.210.
(5) Disposal of a vehicle to a dismantler as provided  in this section extinguishes all prior own-
ership and possessory rights.
(6) The department shall adopt rules specifying the form in which notification to  the department
required by  subsection (1) of this section shall be submitted and what information shall be conveyed
to the department. The person that tows the vehicle may submit to the  dismantler a copy of any
notification submitted to the department under this section instead of submitting to  the dismantler
ownership or other title documents for the vehicle.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 819.280 is amended to read:
819.280. (1) A person may make a request to an authority described in ORS 819.140 (1)(b) or  (c)
to dispose of a vehicle that is on the private property of the person and that is appraised at a value
of [ $500] $1,000 or less, as determined by a holder  of a certificate issued under ORS 819.480, if the
person is in lawful possession of the vehicle. For the purposes of  this subsection, a person need not
have the certificate of title to be in lawful possession of the vehicle.
(2) If the authority requested to dispose of a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section chooses
to dispose of the vehicle, the authority shall do all of the following:
(a) Photograph the vehicle.
(b) Verify that the person is in lawful possession of the vehicle.
(c) Provide notification  to the person requesting the disposal and the Department of Transpor-
tation of all of the following:
(A) The name and address of the person requesting the disposal;
(B) The vehicle identification number;
(C) The appraised value of the vehicle;
(D) The appraiser’s certificate number and signature; and
(E) The name and address of the authority disposing of the vehicle.
(d) Dispose of the vehicle and its contents to  a person who holds a valid dismantler certificate
issued under ORS 822.110.
(3) The  authority disposing of the vehicle may charge the person requesting the disposal a fee
to dispose of the vehicle.
(4) Disposal of a vehicle to a dismantler  as provided in this section extinguishes all prior own-
ership and possessory rights.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 10
(5) The department shall adopt rules specifying the form in which  notification required by sub-
section (2) of this section shall be submitted and what additional information shall be  conveyed to
the department.
(6) In lieu of submitting ownership or other title documents for the vehicle,  the authority dis-
posing of the vehicle may submit to the dismantler a copy  of the notification provided to the de-
partment under subsection (2) of this section.
VEHICLE DEALERS
SECTION 20.  ORS 822.043 is amended to read:
822.043. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Integrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 802.600.
(b) “Vehicle dealer” means a person issued a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS 822.020.
(2) A vehicle dealer that the Department of Transportation has designated to act  as an agent
of the department  under ORS 802.031 may elect to prepare, submit, or prepare and submit documents
necessary to:
(a) Issue or transfer a certificate of title for a vehicle;
(b) Register a vehicle or transfer registration of a vehicle;
(c) Issue a registration plate;
(d) Verify and clear a title;
(e) Perfect, release or satisfy a lien or other security interest;
(f) Comply with federal security requirements; or
(g) Render any other services for  the purpose of complying with state and federal laws related
to the sale of a vehicle.
(3) A vehicle dealer who prepares any documents described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) May charge a purchaser of a vehicle a document  processing fee for the preparation of those
documents.
(b) May not charge  a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for the submission of
any document or the issuance of a registration plate.
(c) May charge  a purchaser of a vehicle a document processing fee for performing any of the
services described in subsection (2) of this section in connection with preparing the documents  de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) Other than the portion of the document processing fee a vehicle dealer pays to  cover
the costs of using an integrator under subsection (5) of  this section,  a purchaser of a vehicle
may negotiate the amount of the document processing fee with a vehicle dealer, but in  no case shall
the document processing fee charged by a vehicle dealer under this section exceed:
(a) $250, if the vehicle dealer uses an integrator; or
(b) $200, if the vehicle dealer does not use an integrator.
(5) If a vehicle dealer charges a document processing  fee under subsection (4)(a) of this section,
of the amount [ collected] charged, $35 shall be paid to the integrator.
(6) Unless otherwise provided by rule,  if a vehicle dealer uses an integrator and charges a
document processing fee greater than that charged for not using  an integrator, the dealer must in-
form the purchaser of the vehicle of the option  of using an integrator to prepare the documents. The
purchaser may then elect whether or not to have the vehicle dealer use an integrator to prepare
the documents.
(7) If the purchaser of a  vehicle pays a document processing fee, the vehicle dealer shall prepare
and submit all documents to complete the transaction as permitted by law.
(8)(a) A vehicle dealer who collects the privilege tax imposed  under ORS 320.405 from the pur-
chaser of a taxable motor vehicle may collect  the privilege tax at the same time and in the same
manner as the vehicle dealer collects document processing fees under  this section. The amount of
the privilege tax shall be in addition to and not in  lieu of document processing fees collected under
this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 11
(b) A vehicle dealer may exclude the  amount of the privilege tax from the capitalized cost and
offering price of a taxable motor vehicle as those terms are defined  by the Department of Justice
by rule.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this  section, before finalizing a retail sales
transaction a vehicle dealer shall:
(a)(A) If the vehicle is subject to the reporting requirements of the  National Motor Ve-
hicle Title Information System, conduct  a vehicle record search using the National Motor
Vehicle Title Information System; or
(B) Conduct a vehicle record search using an equivalent commercially available  system
to the National Motor Vehicle  Title Information System that, at a minimum, maintains re-
cords from those states participating in data sharing with the National Motor Vehicle  Title
Information System;
(b) Verify the title information; and
(c) Inform the retail  customer of any brand, defect or irregularity found in the search
that could impact the vehicle’s value.
(10) Subsection (9) of this section does not  apply when a vehicle is sold with a salvage
title certificate or with a document issued by another state with a title brand, as defined by
the Department of Transportation by rule.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 822.045 is amended to read:
822.045. (1) A vehicle dealer  improperly conducts a vehicle dealer business and is subject to the
penalties under this section if the vehicle dealer commits any of the following offenses:
(a) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of failure  to obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer cer-
tificate if the vehicle  dealer opens any additional place of business using the same business name
as a place of business approved under a vehicle dealer certificate without first obtaining a  supple-
mental dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(b) A vehicle  dealer commits the offense of failure to obtain a corrected vehicle dealer certif-
icate  if  the dealer moves a place of business or changes the business name without first obtaining
a corrected dealer certificate under ORS 822.040.
(c) A vehicle dealer commits  the offense of failure to maintain proper vehicle dealer records if
the dealer does not keep records  or books, whether maintained in paper or electronic form, with all
of the following information concerning any  used or secondhand vehicles or campers the dealer
deals with:
(A) A record of the purchase, sale or exchange or of the dealer’s receipt for purpose of sale.
(B) A description of the vehicle or camper.
(C) The name and address of the seller, the purchaser and the alleged owner or other person
from whom the vehicle or camper was purchased or received or to whom it was sold or delivered.
(D) For motor vehicles, the  vehicle identification number and any other numbers or identifica-
tion marks as may be thereon  and a statement that a number has been obliterated, defaced or
changed, if such is a fact.
(E) For trailers and campers, the  vehicle identification number and any other numbers or iden-
tification marks as may be thereon.
(F) A duly assigned certificate of title or other primary ownership record or a  bill of sale from
the registered owner of the vehicle or camper from the time of delivery to the dealer until the dealer
disposes of the vehicle or camper. If title is issued for the vehicle in a form other than a certificate,
or if the primary ownership record is in a form other than a document, a dealer shall keep records
in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Transportation for the purpose of complying
with this subparagraph.
(G) A copy of a National Motor Vehicle Title Information System vehicle  record report
obtained by the vehicle dealer through  a National Motor Vehicle Title Information System
data provider, or an equivalent commercially  available system when permitted under ORS
822.043.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 12
(d) A vehicle dealer commits the  offense of failure to allow administrative inspection if the
dealer refuses to allow the department to conduct an inspection  under ORS 822.035 at any time
during normal business hours.
(e) A vehicle dealer  commits the offense of failure to allow police inspection if the dealer refuses
to allow  any police officer to conduct an inspection under ORS 810.480 at any time during normal
business hours.
(f) A vehicle dealer commits the offense  of illegal use of dealer vehicle for hire if the dealer
allows any vehicle operated under vehicle dealer registration  to be loaned or rented with or without
driver for hire or direct compensation.
(g) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper use of dealer  plates or devices if the dealer
or employee  of the dealer causes or permits the display or use of any special vehicle dealer regis-
tration plate or device on any vehicle not owned or controlled by the dealer.
(h) A person commits the offense of improper display  of dealer plates if the person operates over
and along the highways of this state any unregistered vehicle owned  or controlled by the dealer and
any dealer plates issued are not displayed in the manner provided in ORS 803.540 for the  display
of registration plates.
(i) A vehicle dealer commits the offense  of failure to exhibit the dealer certificate if the dealer
fails to permanently exhibit the certificate at the place of business of the person  at all times while
the certificate is in force.
(j) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a vehicle dealer commits the  offense of
failure to provide clear title if:
(A) Within 15 days of transfer of any interest in a vehicle or camper to the dealer  by a con-
sumer, the dealer fails to satisfy:
(i) The interest of any person from whom the dealer  purchased or obtained the vehicle or
camper;
(ii) The interest of any person from whom the person described  in sub-subparagraph (i) of this
subparagraph leased the vehicle or camper; and
(iii) All security interests in the vehicle or camper entered into prior to the time of transfer.
(B) Within 15 days  of receiving clear title to a vehicle or camper from another dealer, the pur-
chasing dealer fails to satisfy the  interest of the dealer from which the purchasing dealer received
the certificate of title  or other primary ownership document. For purposes of this subparagraph, a
purchasing dealer receives a certificate of title or other  primary ownership document from a dealer
on the date:
(i) The purchasing dealer or the Department of Transportation takes physical  possession of the
certificate or document; or
(ii) A written notice is mailed by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested,  to the
purchasing dealer from the dealer, stating  that the certificate or document is available to be picked
up at a place and time prearranged by both parties. The written notice  must be mailed to a business
address of the purchasing dealer that is on file with the  department. Service by mail under this
sub-subparagraph is effective on the date of mailing.
(k) Except as provided in subsection (3)  of this section, a vehicle dealer commits the offense of
failure to furnish certificate of title or application for title if, within 90 calendar days of transfer
of any interest in a vehicle or camper by the dealer, the dealer has failed to:
(A) Furnish the certificate of title or other primary ownership record for  the vehicle or camper
and any release  thereon or, if title has been issued or is to be issued in a form other than a certif-
icate, any information or documents required  by rule of the department, to the security interest
holder next named, if any, otherwise to the lessor or, if none, to the purchaser; or
(B) Submit to the department in a manner that complies with any  applicable statutes and rules,
an application for title on behalf of the  person to whom the title is to be furnished or whose name
is to be shown on the title record.
(L) A vehicle dealer  commits the offense of failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage
if the dealer permits a bond or letter of credit to lapse during the period that the bond or letter of
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 13
credit is required under ORS 822.020 or if  the dealer fails to purchase a bond or letter of credit
required by ORS 822.030.
(m) A person commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer  while under revocation, cancel-
lation or suspension if the person conducts business as a vehicle dealer in this state and the person’s
vehicle dealer certificate is revoked, canceled or  suspended, regardless of whether the person is li-
censed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction. This  paragraph does not apply if the person has
other current, valid dealer certificates issued in this state.
(n) A vehicle dealer commits the offense of improper  display of a vehicle for advertising pur-
poses if  the dealer displays a vehicle at a location other than the dealer’s place of business for the
purpose of advertising and the dealer does not comply with the provisions of ORS 822.040 (4).
(2) A dealer is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(j)(A) of
this section if the dealer fails to satisfy an interest in a vehicle or camper that  arises from an in-
ventory financing security interest for which the dealer is the debtor.
(3) A  dealer is not considered to have committed the offense described in subsection (1)(k) of this
section if the dealer demonstrates that:
(a) The dealer has made a good faith effort to comply; and
(b) The dealer’s inability to provide title is due to circumstances beyond the dealer’s control.
(4) The offenses described in this section are subject to the following penalties:
(a) The offense described in this section, failure to obtain a supplemental vehicle dealer  certif-
icate, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) The offense described in this section, failure to  obtain a corrected vehicle dealer certificate,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The offense described in this section, failure to maintain  proper vehicle dealer records, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
(d) The  offense described in this section, failure to allow administrative inspection, is a Class
A misdemeanor.
(e) The offense described in  this section, failure to allow police inspection, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(f) The offense described in this section, illegal use of dealer vehicle  for hire, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(g) The offense described in this section, improper  use of dealer plates or devices, is a Class D
traffic violation.
(h) The  offense described in this section, improper display of dealer plates, is a Class B traffic
violation.
(i) The offense described in  this section, failure to exhibit the dealer certificate, is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(j) The offense described in this section, failure to provide clear title, is a Class A  misdemeanor.
(k) The offense described in this section, failure to furnish certificate  of title or application for
title, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(L) The  offense described in this section, failure to maintain bond or letter of credit coverage,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(m) The offense described in  this section, acting as a vehicle dealer while under revocation,
cancellation or suspension, is a Class A misdemeanor.
(n) The offense described in this section, improper display of a  vehicle for advertising purposes,
is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 822.040 is amended to read:
822.040. (1)  The holder of a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020
may exercise the following privileges under the certificate:
(a) Subject to ORS 822.045, a dealer is authorized, without violating ORS  803.025 or 803.300, to
use and operate over and along the highways of this  state vehicles displaying the dealer’s plates
whether registered or not or whether or not a title is issued for the vehicle if the vehicle:
(A) Is owned or controlled by the dealer;
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 14
(B) Is used by the dealer, members of the dealer’s firm, any salesperson  thereof or any person
authorized by the dealer;
(C) Indicates it is offered for sale; and
(D) When offered  for sale, is available for display during the vehicle dealer’s normal business
hours.
(b) A dealer is entitled to receive dealer plates or devices and  replacement or additional dealer
plates or devices. As  many additional dealer plates as may be desired may be obtained upon the
filing of a formal application for  additional plates with the Department of Transportation. The plates
issued to dealers shall require the payment of fees as provided under ORS 805.250.
(c) The person  is not subject to the prohibitions and penalties under ORS 822.005 as long as the
holder’s vehicle dealer business is conducted in a location approved under the certificate.
(d) The dealer  shall be considered the owner of vehicles manufactured or dealt in by the dealer,
before delivery and sale of the vehicles, and of all  vehicles in the dealer’s possession and operated
or driven by the dealer or the dealer’s employees.
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 825.474, in lieu of paying  the weight-mile tax imposed under ORS
825.474, the dealer may pay the  fuel taxes imposed under ORS 319.020 and 319.530, when the vehicle:
(A) Displays the dealer’s plates;
(B) Is actually owned or controlled by  the dealer and in actual use by the dealer, members of
the dealer’s firm, any salesperson of the dealer or any person authorized by the dealer;
(C) Is operated on the highway for the purpose of test driving the vehicle; and
(D) Is unloaded.
(f) The dealer may perform  all activities of a dealer under ORS 822.005 without first ob-
taining a supplemental certificate if the activities are conducted entirely  online or through
other electronic means.
(2) The holder of a vehicle dealer certificate may open additional places of business under  the
same business name by obtaining a supplemental  certificate from the department under this sub-
section. The following all apply to a supplemental certificate issued under this subsection:
(a) The department may not issue  a supplemental certificate under this subsection if the addi-
tional place of business opened will be operated under a different business name than that indicated
on the current certificate. Any business that a  vehicle dealer operates under a separate business
name must be operated under a separate certificate and the dealer must apply for and pay the  fees
for a regular dealer certificate for the business.
(b) A supplemental certificate issued under this subsection is subject to the fee  for supplemental
certificate under ORS 822.700.
(c) A supplemental certificate is  not required for the holder to deliver a vehicle sold by
the holder to a purchaser at a location other  than the location approved under the certif-
icate.
(3) The holder of a vehicle dealer certificate may move a place of business or change a business
name by obtaining a corrected certificate  from the department. For purposes of this subsection,
“place of business”  includes a recreational vehicle service facility as defined in ORS 822.082. The
following apply to a corrected certificate issued under this subsection:
(a) The department shall prescribe the form for application for a corrected certificate.
(b) A person  applying for a corrected certificate shall pay the fee for the corrected certificate
established in ORS 822.700.
(4) The department may establish by rule the requirements  a holder of a vehicle dealer certif-
icate must meet to display a vehicle at a location other than  the dealer’s place of business for the
purpose of advertising without first  obtaining a supplemental certificate from the department. In
addition to any requirements established by the department by rule, all of the following apply:
(a) The dealer must have a signed agreement  with the owner of the property or the person using
the property where the vehicle  is to be displayed stating that the vehicle is for an advertising pro-
motion only and that the  processing of any documents or other activities required to purchase a
vehicle must be done at the dealer’s place of business.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 15
(b) The vehicle on display must be  clearly marked with the dealer’s name and contact informa-
tion and a notice that the vehicle is  displayed only for the purpose of advertising and may be pur-
chased only at the dealer’s place of business.
(c) Displaying the vehicle must not violate any zoning laws or ordinances.
(d) The dealer or the dealer’s employees may not remain with the  vehicle except for the purpose
of moving the vehicle in or out of the display area.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 822.050 is amended to read:
822.050. (1) The Department of Transportation may revoke or suspend the right of  a person
to renew a vehicle dealer certificate  or apply for a vehicle dealer certificate for a different
vehicle dealer business or in a different business name, and may  revoke, suspend or place on
probation a vehicle dealer  certificate  if the  department determines at any time for due cause that
the dealer has done any of the following:
(a) Violated any grounds  for revocation, suspension or probation adopted by the department by
rule under ORS 822.035.
(b) Failed to comply with the requirements  of the vehicle code with reference to notices or re-
ports of the transfer of vehicles or campers.
(c) Caused or suffered or  is permitting the unlawful use of any certificate or registration plates.
(d) Violated or caused or permitted to be violated ORS 815.410, 815.415, 815.425 or 815.430.
(e) Falsely certified under ORS  822.033 that the dealer is exempt from the requirement under
ORS 822.020 to file a certificate of insurance.
(f) Continued to fail to provide clear title or repeatedly failed to provide clear title  in violation
of ORS 822.045.
(g) Knowingly certified false information required by  the department on an application for a
vehicle dealer certificate, supplemental certificate or corrected certificate.
(h) Failed to pay a civil penalty  assessed under ORS 822.009 and the amount of penalty was not
paid within 10 days after the order becomes final.
(i) Displayed dealer plates on vehicles unless the vehicle was offered for sale.
(2) The department shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate 45 days  after receipt of legal notice
that the bond described  under ORS 822.030 is canceled, unless the department receives proof from
the vehicle dealer that the dealer has obtained another bond. Between the day that  the department
receives notice that the bond is canceled and the day the vehicle dealer presents proof of another
bond, the vehicle dealer may not act as a vehicle dealer.
(3) The department shall cancel a vehicle  dealer certificate 45 days after receipt of notice that
the certificate of insurance required under ORS 822.033 is canceled, unless  the department receives
proof from the  vehicle dealer that the dealer has obtained another certificate of insurance. Between
the day that the department receives notice that the  certificate of insurance is canceled and the day
the vehicle dealer presents proof of another certificate of insurance, the  vehicle dealer may not act
as a vehicle dealer.
(4) The  department shall cancel a vehicle dealer certificate immediately upon receipt of notice
that zoning approval for the business has been revoked.
(5) Upon revocation, cancellation  or suspension of a vehicle dealer certificate under this section,
the department shall  recall and demand the return of the certificate and any vehicle dealer plates
issued.
(6) The department may suspend a vehicle dealer certificate if the department determines
that the holder of the certificate is not a vehicle dealer under ORS 822.035 (3).
SECTION 24.
 ORS 822.145 is amended to read:
822.145. (1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law,  the Department of Transportation
may impose sanctions on any person  holding a dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 or
identification card or supplemental dismantler certificate  issued under ORS 822.125 including, but
not limited to, suspension or revocation  of the right of a person to renew the dismantler
certificate or apply for a certificate  for a different vehicle dismantler business or in a dif-
ferent business  name, probation or suspension, revocation or cancellation of the dismantler cer-
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 16
tificate or identification card if the department determines at any time for due  cause that any of the
following has occurred:
(a) The person holding the  certificate has failed to comply with any requirements for registra-
tion of vehicles under the vehicle code.
(b) The person holding the certificate has violated ORS 803.140, 819.012, 819.016, 819.040,
822.120, 822.125, 822.133, 822.135, 822.137 or 822.150.
(c) The person  holding the certificate has caused or suffered or is permitting the unlawful use
of the dismantler certificate.
(d) The person holding the certificate has violated any regulation adopted under ORS 822.135.
(e) The person holding the certificate has failed to allow the department  to conduct inspections
as provided under ORS 822.130.
(f) The person holding an identification card has  unlawfully used or permitted unlawful use of
the card.
(g) The person holding the certificate is convicted of  an offense under ORS 468.922, 468.926,
468.929, 468.931, 468.936, 468.939, 468.943 or 468.946.
(2) The department shall cancel or suspend any dismantler certificate immediately:
(a) Upon receipt of legal notice that the bond described under ORS 822.120 is canceled; [ or]
(b) For failure to pay any penalty imposed under ORS 822.135 or 822.137[ .]; or
(c) Upon receipt  of written notice from the local government authority that approval of
the dismantler location granted according to ORS 822.140 has been revoked.
(3) Upon revocation,  cancellation or suspension of a dismantler certificate or identification card
under this section, the department shall recall and demand the return  of the certificate or identifi-
cation card.
(4) If the department has reason to believe that a  person has engaged in or is engaging in any
activity prohibited under ORS 822.100, the department may issue an  order directed at the person to
cease the activity.
(5) The department shall adopt rules establishing sanctions authorized by  subsection (1) of this
section.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 822.035 is amended to read:
822.035. The Department of Transportation:
(1) Upon receipt of an application for a vehicle dealer certificate, shall  examine the application
and may make an individual investigation relative to statements contained in the application.
(2) Upon being satisfied that an applicant is entitled  to a vehicle dealer certificate and that the
proper fees have been paid for the certificate, shall assign  the vehicle dealer a distinctive dealer
number that allows the dealer to conduct business under  the certificate and shall forward to the
dealer a vehicle dealer certificate stating thereon the dealer’s number.
(3) Has authority to determine whether or not an applicant for a  vehicle dealer certificate is a
vehicle  dealer.
(4) Has authority to make suitable rules for the issuance  of vehicle dealer certificates to expire
consistently with ORS 822.020.
(5) May make  inspections of any vehicle dealer records required under ORS 822.045 and of any
vehicles  included  in a vehicle dealer’s inventory or located on the vehicle dealer’s premises. In-
spections authorized by this subsection may be conducted by the department at reasonable intervals
and may not exceed a scope of inspection necessary for the department to determine the following:
(a) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with statutes regulating vehicle dealers under  the vehicle
code;
(b) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with those provisions of the vehicle code regulating  the titling
and registration of vehicles;
(c) A vehicle dealer’s compliance with rules adopted by the department relating  to the regu-
lation of vehicle dealers and the registration and titling of vehicles; and
(d) The identification of stolen vehicles.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 17
(6) May make inspections  during the normal business hours of the department, from Monday
through Friday.
(7) Shall provide a vehicle dealer with plates or devices authorized under ORS 805.200 to  allow
the exercise of the privileges granted under ORS 822.040.
(8) May provide a vehicle dealer with identification cards in the names of the  owners of the
business or in the names of authorized employees of the business.
(9) May not issue a vehicle dealer certificate  under ORS 822.020 to an applicant who has been
issued a similar certificate from another jurisdiction that has  been revoked or is currently sus-
pended unless the applicant possesses a  current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS
822.020.
(10) May not use the revocation or suspension by  another jurisdiction of a vehicle dealer cer-
tificate or similar certificate  as a basis for refusing to allow a vehicle dealer holding a current, valid
vehicle dealer certificate issued  under ORS 822.020 to obtain a vehicle dealer certificate under ORS
822.020 or a supplemental certificate under ORS 822.040.
(11) May adopt any reasonable rules necessary for the administration of the  laws relating to the
regulation of vehicle dealers, the issuance  or denial of issuance  of vehicle dealer certificates, the
issuance of vehicle dealer  identification cards, regulation of vehicle dealers designated as agents
under ORS 802.031 and the issuance of vehicle dealer plates. The rules  adopted under this sub-
section must be consistent with the statutory provisions  of the vehicle code. The rules may include,
but are not limited to, grounds and procedures for  the revocation, denial, probation or suspension
of vehicle dealer certificates or of a vehicle dealer’s designation  to act as an agent of the depart-
ment.
SECTION 26.  ORS 822.015 is amended to read:
822.015. (1) In addition to any exemptions from  the vehicle code under ORS 801.026, ORS 822.005
does not apply to the following vehicles or persons:
(a) Road rollers, farm tractors, farm  trailers, trolleys, implements of husbandry, emergency ve-
hicles, well-drilling machinery and boat or  utility trailers with a gross weight of 1,800 pounds or
less.
(b) The owner of a vehicle as shown  by the vehicle title issued by any jurisdiction if the person
owned the  vehicle primarily for personal, family or household purposes. If the person has sold,
traded, displayed or offered for sale,  trade or exchange more than five vehicles in one calendar year,
the person shall have the burden of proving that the  person owned the vehicles primarily for per-
sonal, family or household  purposes or for other purposes that the Department of Transportation,
by rule, defines as constituting an exemption under this section.
(c) A receiver,  trustee, personal representative or public officer while performing any official
duties.
(d) The lessor or security interest holder of a vehicle as shown by the vehicle title issued by
any jurisdiction.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a manufacturer who sells vehicles the man-
ufacturer has manufactured in Oregon. Nothing in this paragraph prevents  any manufacturer from
obtaining a vehicle dealer certificate  under ORS 822.020. This paragraph does not exempt a man-
ufacturer who sells or trades campers or travel trailers.
(f) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business  under ORS 744.515 or 744.521 who is dis-
posing of vehicles for salvage.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a person who sells or  trades or offers to sell
or trade  a vehicle that has been used in the operation of the person’s business. This paragraph does
not exempt a person who is in the business of  selling, trading, displaying, rebuilding, renting or
leasing vehicles from any requirement to obtain a certificate for dealing in those vehicles.
(h) A person who receives no money, goods or services, either directly or indirectly,  for dis-
playing a vehicle or acting as an agent in the buying or selling of a vehicle.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 18
(i) A person who collects, purchases, acquires, trades or disposes of vehicles and vehicle parts
for the person’s own  use in order to preserve, restore and maintain vehicles for the person’s own
use or for hobby or historical purposes.
[(j) A manufactured structure dealer subject to the  licensing requirement of ORS 446.671 or a
person exempt from licensing under ORS 446.676 when selling a vehicle, trailer or semitrailer accepted
in trade as part of a manufactured structure transaction. A manufactured structure dealership or ex-
empt person may not directly sell more than three vehicles per calendar  year under authority of this
paragraph, but by consignment  with a dealer certified under ORS 822.020 may sell an unlimited
number of vehicles acquired as described in this paragraph. ]
[(k)] (j)  A lien claimant who sells vehicles in order to foreclose possessory liens.
[(L)] (k)  A lien claimant who, in a 12-month period, sells 12 or fewer vehicles that the  lien
claimant acquired through possessory liens if the  vehicles are sold at the business location of the
lien claimant.
[(m)] (L)  Electric personal assistive mobility devices.
[(n)] (m)  A tower that received title for a vehicle under ORS 822.235.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005, the following may participate with other  dealers in a display
of vehicles, including but not limited to an auto show, if the display is an event that lasts for 10 days
or less and is an event for which the public is charged admission:
(a) A person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction; or
(b) Any employee of a person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer in another jurisdiction.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 822.005, a person who is licensed as a vehicle dealer  in another juris-
diction or an employee of a person who is  certified or licensed as a vehicle dealer may participate
in a vehicle auction if the vehicle auction is:
(a) Conducted by a vehicle dealer who holds a vehicle dealer certificate  issued under ORS
822.020; and
(b) Open only to certified or licensed vehicle dealers or their employees.
(4) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this  section, including but
not limited to specifying which dealers may take vehicles on consignment from other jurisdictions.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 822.093 is amended to read:
822.093. (1) Notwithstanding [ ORS 822.015 (1)(k) or (L) ] ORS 822.015 (1)(j) or (k) , a lien claim-
ant who sells or offers for sale vehicles being sold to foreclose possessory  liens, or sells or offers
for sale vehicles acquired through possessory liens, shall  keep records sufficient to establish that
all vehicles being sold or offered for sale were acquired by the lien claimant  as the result of a
possessory lien. Records kept in accordance with this subsection must be made available to  the
Department of Transportation on request.
(2) The department may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the provisions  of this
section, including but not limited to rules that:
(a) Specify the form in which the records must be kept, how  the records must be maintained and
the period for which they must be retained.
(b) Specify how the records will be provided to the department if requested.
(c) Specify how  lien claimants will notify the department when vehicles are sold to foreclose
possessory liens and when vehicles acquired through possessory liens are sold.
(3) Rules adopted  under this section shall be developed in consultation with representatives of
those lien  claimants who may be affected by this section, including but not limited to towing busi-
ness operators.
(4) The department may impose a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed $1,000 for  each vi-
olation, against any person who violates this section or any rules adopted by the  department under
this section. Civil penalties shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 822.094 is amended to read:
822.094. A sale, consignment or other transfer by a lien claimant does  not constitute a sale for
purposes of [ ORS 822.015 (1)(L) ] ORS 822.015 (1)(k)  if the sale, consignment or other transfer is to
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 19
the holder of a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110 or  to the holder of a
current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS 822.020.
NOTE: Section 29 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
TOTALED VEHICLES
SECTION 30.  ORS 819.012 is amended to read:
819.012. (1) A person other than an insurer commits the offense of  failure to follow procedures
for a totaled vehicle if the person:
(a) Is the registered owner of a vehicle that is a totaled vehicle as  defined in ORS 801.527 (1)
and does not surrender the certificate of title for the vehicle either to  the Department of Trans-
portation or to the insurer within 30 days of the declaration [ or other relevant act ] by the insurer.
(b) Is the registered owner of a vehicle that is a totaled vehicle as  defined in ORS 801.527 (2)
and does not  notify the department of the status of the vehicle within 30 days of the day that the
vehicle became a totaled vehicle.
(c) Is the registered owner of a vehicle that is a totaled vehicle  as defined in ORS 801.527 (3)
and does not surrender the certificate of title for the vehicle  to the department within 30 days of
the date the vehicle became a totaled vehicle.
(d) Receives or purchases a totaled vehicle and does not surrender  the certificate of title for the
vehicle to the department within 30 days of purchase or receipt of the vehicle.
(2) A person is not required to surrender the certificate of title if the person is unable to obtain
the certificate for the vehicle. If the person is unable to obtain the certificate,  the person shall no-
tify the department that  the vehicle is a totaled vehicle and shall notify the department of the rea-
son that the person is unable to surrender the certificate.
(3) A person is not required to surrender the certificate of title if:
(a) The person transferred their interest in the totaled vehicle to a  tower pursuant to ORS
822.235; or
(b) The person is  a tower that received interest in the totaled vehicle pursuant to ORS 822.235
and the tower subsequently transfers interest in  the totaled vehicle to a dismantler within 30 days
of the date the tower received interest in the totaled vehicle.
(4) If the vehicle is one for which title was  issued in a form other than a certificate, the person
shall notify the  department that the vehicle is a totaled vehicle and shall follow procedures adopted
by the department by rule.
(5) The offense described in this section, failure  to follow procedures for a totaled vehicle, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
NOTE:
 Section 31 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
DESTROYED VEHICLES
SECTION 32.  ORS 803.092 is amended to read:
803.092. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, upon the  transfer of any interest in a
vehicle covered by an Oregon title the transferee shall submit an  application for title to the De-
partment of Transportation.  Such application shall be submitted to the department within 30 days
of the date of transfer of interest.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, application is not required under this  section
when:
(a) The change  involves only a change in the security interest where the security interest holder
or lessor is a financial institution, a financial holding company or a bank holding company, as those
terms are defined in ORS 706.008, a licensee under ORS chapter 725, or any subsidiary or  affiliate
of any of the foregoing and the transfer of the interest of the security interest holder or lessor:
(A) Results from the merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or acquisition of the  se-
curity interest holder or lessor;
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 20
(B) Is to an entity that is a member of the same affiliated group  as the security holder or lessor;
or
(C) Is made in connection with a transfer in bulk.
(b) The vehicle is transferred to  a vehicle dealer and the vehicle will become part of the dealer’s
inventory  for  resale. Upon the transfer of a vehicle to a dealer, however, the dealer shall imme-
diately notify  the department of such transfer. This exemption from the requirement to apply for
title does not apply if the department determines that application for title is  necessary in order to
comply with odometer disclosure  requirements. If the department determines that application for
title is not required, it may require filing of documents under ORS 803.126.
(c) The vehicle is to be titled in another jurisdiction.
(d) The vehicle has been totaled, wrecked,  dismantled, disassembled[ , substantially altered ] or
destroyed, in which case the provisions of ORS 819.010, 819.012,  819.014 or 822.135 relating to notice
and surrender of title documents shall be complied with.
(e) The transfer involves the creation or termination of a leasehold interest in a vehicle  that is
proportionally registered under ORS 826.009  or 826.011, if the department is furnished with satis-
factory proof of the lease.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the transferee shall:
(a) Submit an application that meets requirements for title under ORS 803.045 and  803.050 and
any applicable rules of the department.
(b) Submit the title transfer fees as required under ORS 803.090.
(c) Comply with the provisions of ORS 803.065 and any applicable rules of the department  under
that statute and submit the duplicate or replacement title fee  as provided under ORS 803.090, if the
transfer includes an application for duplicate or replacement title and transfer of title.
(d) Submit an odometer disclosure containing information required by the department for  the
kind of transaction involved.
(e) Submit any late presentation of  certificate of title fee as provided under ORS 803.090 if such
fee is required under ORS 803.105.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Affiliated group” has  the meaning given to the term in section 1504(a) of the Internal Re-
venue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. 1504(a)).
(b) A “transfer in bulk” is:
(A) The sale or assignment of, the grant of a security interest in, or any other transfer of  either
a group of loans secured by vehicles, leases of vehicles or both or a  participation or other interest
in the group of loans;
(B) The creation of asset-backed securities or other securing of assets involving  the loans or
leases; or
(C) Any similar transaction involving the loans or leases.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 803.092, as amended by section  3, chapter 428, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
803.092. (1) Except as otherwise provided in  this section, upon the transfer of any interest in a
vehicle covered by an Oregon title the  transferee shall submit an application for title to the De-
partment of Transportation. Such application shall be submitted to the department within  30 days
of the date of transfer of interest.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, application is not required under this  section
when:
(a) The change  involves only a change in the security interest where the security interest holder
or lessor is a financial institution, a financial holding company or a bank holding company, as those
terms are  defined in ORS 706.008, a licensee under ORS chapter 725, or any subsidiary or affiliate
of any of the foregoing and the transfer of the interest of the security interest holder or lessor:
(A) Results  from the merger, conversion, reorganization, consolidation or acquisition of the se-
curity interest holder or lessor;
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 21
(B) Is to an entity that is a member of the same affiliated group  as the security holder or lessor;
or
(C) Is made in connection with a transfer in bulk.
(b) The vehicle is transferred to  a vehicle dealer and the vehicle will become part of the dealer’s
inventory  for  resale. Upon the transfer of a vehicle to a dealer, however, the dealer shall imme-
diately notify  the department of such transfer. This exemption from the requirement to apply for
title does not apply if the department determines that application for title is  necessary in order to
comply with odometer disclosure  requirements. If the department determines that application for
title is not required, it may require filing of documents under ORS 803.126.
(c) The vehicle is to be titled in another jurisdiction.
(d) The vehicle has been totaled, wrecked,  dismantled, disassembled[ , substantially altered ] or
destroyed, in which case the provisions of ORS 819.010, 819.012,  819.014 or 822.135 relating to notice
and surrender of title documents shall be complied with.
(e) The transfer involves the creation or termination of a leasehold interest in a vehicle  that is
proportionally registered under ORS 826.009  or 826.011, if the department is furnished with satis-
factory proof of the lease.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the transferee shall:
(a) Submit an application that meets requirements for title under ORS 803.045 and  803.050 and
any applicable rules of the department.
(b) Submit the title transfer fees as required under ORS 803.090.
(c) Comply with the provisions of ORS 803.065 and any applicable rules of the department  under
that statute and submit the duplicate or replacement title fee  as provided under ORS 803.090, if the
transfer includes an application for duplicate or replacement title and transfer of title.
(d) Submit an odometer disclosure containing information required by the department for  the
kind of transaction involved.
(e) Submit any late presentation of  certificate of title fee as provided under ORS 803.090 if such
fee is required under ORS 803.105.
(4)(a) If  requested on the application for title, the department shall provide the primary security
interest holder with an electronic title. If no request is made on the application, the department
may issue a certificate of title.
(b) When the primary security interest holder receives an electronic title,  within 30 days of the
release of the security interest the primary security interest holder shall electronically submit  the
release of interest to the department in the manner provided by the department by rule.
(c) A duly certified copy of the department’s  electronic record of the title reflecting the lien is
admissible in any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding in this state  as evidence of the exist-
ence of a lien.
(d) The department shall  adopt rules related to electronic application and the electronic release
of liens and notice to lienholders.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) “Affiliated group” has  the meaning given to the term in section 1504(a) of the Internal Re-
venue Code of 1986, as amended (26 U.S.C. 1504(a)).
(b) A “transfer in bulk” is:
(A) The sale or assignment of, the grant of a security interest in, or any other transfer of  either
a group of loans secured by vehicles, leases of vehicles or both or a  participation or other interest
in the group of loans;
(B) The creation of asset-backed securities or other securing of assets involving  the loans or
leases; or
(C) Any similar transaction involving the loans or leases.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 803.530 is amended to read:
803.530. (1) Registration plates assigned to a vehicle by the Department of Transportation shall
remain with the vehicle to which the plates are assigned and are valid only during  the registration
period for which the plates are issued except as provided in this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 22
(2) The department may allow registration plates to be transferred to another vehicle if:
(a) The department receives an application;
(b) The applicant pays the plate transfer fee under ORS 803.575; and
(c) The applicant complies with the registration qualifications described in ORS 803.350.
(3) The department shall  transfer registration plates under this section if the applicant and the
vehicle qualify for the plates and the plates are:
(a) Legible and capable of being used for identification purposes; and
(b) Any of the following:
(A) From a current issue of registration plates;
(B) Customized registration plates described under ORS 805.240;
(C) Oregon Trail  commemorative registration plates issued under section 113, chapter 741,
Oregon Laws 1993;
(D) Special registration plates  issued under ORS 805.255, 805.260, 805.263, 805.266, 805.278 or
805.283;
(E) Group registration plates issued under ORS 805.205;
(F) Veterans’ recognition registration plates issued under ORS 805.105;
(G) Pacific Wonderland registration plates issued under ORS 805.287;
(H) Registration plates issued through the special registration program under ORS 805.222; or
(I) Registration plates that  are no longer currently issued that the department determines may
still be transferred.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 803.400, when registration plates are  transferred from one vehicle to
another vehicle owned by the same person, the registration period represented  by the plates also
transfers with the plates. When registration plates are transferred from one vehicle to another ve-
hicle not owned by the same person, the remaining registration period  represented by the trans-
ferred plates ceases for both the vehicle receiving the transferred plates and the vehicle  from which
the plates were removed.
(5) The owner  of a registered vehicle to which a plate is assigned may replace a registration
plate. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a plate  under this subsection, the owner must apply to the department for re-
placement of  the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement plate fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The department, in lieu of replacement,  may issue duplicate plates for the same fee as
charged for replacements.
(c) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
(d) The replaced plates may not be considered customized plates when they are replaced, if:
(A) The original plates were from plates currently issued;
(B) The original plates were not customized plates; and
(C) The replacement plates are a duplicate of the original plates.
(e) When a vehicle is assigned a pair of plates and the owner  wishes to replace a single plate,
the department may replace a single plate rather than replace both plates.
(6) A county may replace a registration plate that is from a specially designed government se-
ries with a registration plate that is from a regular series. The following apply to this subsection:
(a) To replace a  plate under this subsection, the county must apply to the department for re-
placement of the plate in a form prescribed by the department and pay the replacement plate  fee
established under ORS 803.575.
(b) The plates issued under this subsection are valid only for the period of the plates replaced.
(7) If  the department retired the vehicle’s registration under ORS 819.030 because the vehicle
is totaled  [ or substantially altered ], a person may apply under subsection (2) of this section to
transfer the registration plates to another vehicle.
(8) Subject to subsections (2) and (4) of  this section, after the department authorizes the use of
special interest plates under ORS 805.210, a person may apply to transfer the plates to either:
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 23
(a) A vehicle that was  previously determined by the department to qualify as a vehicle of special
interest; or
(b) A vehicle approved by the department as  a vehicle of special interest at the time of appli-
cation.
(9) If a person described in subsection (8) of this section  provides the department with only one
special interest registration plate for transfer and the department’s vehicle records show  the special
interest registration plate belongs to a vehicle record with no owner  matching an applicant, the
applicant shall provide proof, as determined by the department by rule, that the plate  is no longer
used on the vehicle it is currently showing being registered to in the department’s vehicle records.
SECTION 35.  ORS 819.030 is amended to read:
819.030. The Department of Transportation shall  comply with the following procedures upon
receiving a certificate  of title or other notice in accordance with the provisions of ORS 819.010,
819.012 or 819.014:
(1) If the department is satisfied that  the vehicle is wrecked, dismantled or disassembled, the
department shall cancel and retire the  registration and title of the vehicle. Except for issuance of
a salvage title, the department may not register or title the vehicle again unless:
(a) The department is satisfied that the original  title certificate, if any, was surrendered in error
or that notice was submitted in error and the record canceled in error; or
(b) The vehicle is registered or titled as an assembled vehicle, a reconstructed vehicle or a
replica.
(2) If the department is satisfied that the vehicle  is wrecked, dismantled or disassembled, the
department may issue a proof of compliance form if no salvage title is issued for the vehicle.
(3) If the department is  satisfied that the vehicle is totaled [ or substantially altered ], the de-
partment may:
(a) Issue a salvage title, retire the vehicle’s registration and cancel the title; or
(b) Issue a branded title.
(4) If a vehicle is recovered after a theft and the theft is the reason that the vehicle was con-
sidered a totaled vehicle or the  department issues a branded title for a totaled [ or substantially al-
tered] vehicle, a person  may apply with the department to keep the same registration plates and the
remaining registration period represented by the plates  with that vehicle. The department may al-
low the owner to keep the registration plates if the plates  are legible and capable of being used for
identification  purposes.
(5) A person may apply with the department to transfer plates from a vehicle for which the  de-
partment previously received a totaled [ or substantially altered ] notification. A plate transfer request
must be in accordance with the provisions of ORS 803.530.
(6) The owner of a  vehicle whose title and registration have been canceled and retired due to
the department being notified it is totaled, wrecked, dismantled[ ,] or  disassembled [ or substantially
altered] is entitled to an administrative review to determine whether the notification was correct.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 822.070 is amended to read:
822.070. (1)  A person commits the offense of conducting an illegal vehicle rebuilding business if
the person is not the holder of a valid current dealer  certificate issued under ORS 822.020 and the
person does any of the following as part of a business:
(a) Buys, sells or deals  in assembled[ ,] or reconstructed [ or substantially altered ] motor vehicles.
(b) Engages in making  assembled[ ,] or  reconstructed [ or substantially altered ] vehicles from mo-
tor vehicle components.
(2) This section does not apply to the following persons or vehicles:
(a) An insurance adjuster authorized to do business under ORS 744.515 or 744.521 who is  dis-
posing of vehicles for salvage.
(b) Vehicles or persons exempt from the vehicle dealer certificate requirements by ORS  822.015
(1)(a) or (i).
(c) Motor vehicles that are not of a type required to be registered under the vehicle code.
(d) The holder of a dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 24
(3) The offense described in this section, conducting an illegal vehicle rebuilding  business, is a
Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 37.  ORS 822.133 is amended to read:
822.133. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Crushed motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, the frame or unibody of  which is compacted
or flattened so that it no longer resembles  any particular year, model or make of motor vehicle and
is less than half of the motor vehicle’s original volume as measured in cubic feet.
(b) “Destroy” means to dismantle, disassemble[ ,] or  damage [ or substantially alter ] a motor ve-
hicle:
(A) With the intent of rendering the vehicle permanently inoperable;
(B) To the extent that the cost of  repairing the vehicle exceeds the actual cash value of the
vehicle prior to the damage; or
(C) To the extent that the sum of the cost of repairing the vehicle and  the salvage value of the
vehicle in its damaged condition exceeds  the actual cash value of the vehicle in its repaired condi-
tion.
(c) “Mobile motor vehicle crusher” means a machine that  compacts or flattens a motor vehicle
into a crushed motor vehicle and is designed to be transported on a highway.
(d) “Wrecked vehicle” means a motor vehicle:
(A) That is destroyed, or is acquired  with the intent to destroy, and that will never be operated
as a motor vehicle; or
(B) That has sustained damage to an extent that the vehicle may not  lawfully be operated on
the highways of this state.
(2) In the operation of a motor vehicle dismantling business, a dismantler:
(a) Must physically separate or visually label a wrecked  vehicle in a manner that readily iden-
tifies the ownership status of the wrecked vehicle if  the dismantler takes possession of the wrecked
vehicle without immediately obtaining an ownership record or salvage title certificate. A dismantler
need not separate or visually identify  a wrecked vehicle pursuant to this subsection if the vehicle
is subject to an exemption under ORS 803.030 or is obtained from a jurisdiction that does  not issue
certificates of title.
(b) May not remove parts from or destroy a motor vehicle prior to obtaining an ownership  re-
cord or salvage title certificate for the vehicle.
(c) Must demolish the registration plates  of a wrecked vehicle at the time the ownership record
is received.
(d) Must notify the Department of  Transportation of any changes in the information provided
to the department in the application for a dismantler certificate within 30 days of the change.
(e) Must furnish a written report to the department, in  a form established by the department
by rule, after a wrecked vehicle is dismantled or destroyed.
(f) Must, every year, have the  premises inspected by local fire inspectors and furnish a written
report to the department, in a form established by the department by rule, on the  findings of the
inspection.
(g) Must be  in compliance with any agreement with, order of or program or process authorized
by the Department of Environmental Quality that governs the conduct of the dismantler.
(3)(a) A dismantler using a mobile motor vehicle crusher shall:
(A) Hold a current, valid dismantler certificate issued under ORS 822.110.
(B) Conspicuously display on the mobile motor vehicle crusher the name of  the dismantler’s
business as listed on the dismantler’s application submitted  pursuant to ORS 822.110 and the
dismantler certificate number issued by the Department of Transportation.
(C) Comply with all of the applicable statutes and rules regulating dismantlers at  each location
where the dismantler uses the mobile motor  vehicle crusher. If the dismantler is using a mobile
motor vehicle crusher at a location approved under a dismantler certificate,  the dismantler who
holds the dismantler certificate for the location shall be responsible for complying with all statutes
and rules regarding dismantlers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 25
(b) If a dismantler  is using a mobile motor vehicle crusher at a temporary location for 15 con-
secutive business days or less, the dismantler is exempt from obtaining a  supplemental dismantler
certificate under ORS 822.125 for the temporary location.
SECTION 38.  ORS 822.135 is amended to read:
822.135. (1) A person commits the offense of improperly conducting a motor vehicle dismantling
business if the person holds a dismantler certificate issued  under ORS 822.110 and the person does
any of the following:
(a) Fails to permanently exhibit a dismantler certificate at a  place of business of the person at
all times while the certificate is in force.
(b) Expands the dimensions of or moves  any of the person’s places of business or opens any
additional places of business without obtaining a supplemental dismantler  certificate by the proce-
dure under ORS 822.125.
(c) Fails to maintain records at the person’s established place of business that record and  de-
scribe the following:
(A) Every motor vehicle  purchased, transferred, wrecked, dismantled, disassembled or substan-
tially altered by the person;
(B) The name and address of the person to and from whom the vehicle was transferred;
(C) The vehicle identification number and other identification  marks or numbers on the vehicle;
and
(D) A statement indicating any such numbers or marks that  have been obliterated, defaced or
changed.
(d) Except as otherwise provided, fails to surrender to the Department of Transportation,  within
30 days after the date the person acquires the title, a certificate of title or other primary ownership
document or ownership record for a motor vehicle. If the  vehicle is delivered to the person under
the provisions of ORS 819.215 or 819.280, a copy of the notification to the  department under ORS
819.215 or 819.280 is sufficient to comply with the provisions of this paragraph.
(e) Refuses, at any time, to allow a police officer or an employee of the  department to inspect
the books, records, inventory or premises of the person’s motor vehicle dismantling business.
(f) Fails to maintain, for the purposes of the person’s  motor vehicle dismantling business, a
building or an enclosure or other barrier at least six feet in  height that is constructed, established
or formed in compliance with rules adopted by the department.
(g) Fails to keep the premises on the outside of the establishment clear and clean at all times.
(h) Conducts any wrecking,  dismantling or altering of vehicles outside the building, enclosure
or barrier on the premises of the business.
(i) Stores or displays  any motor vehicles or major component parts or conducts the motor ve-
hicle dismantling business outside of the building, enclosure or barrier of the place of business.
(j) Fails to immediately file  with the department, upon transfer of a wrecked or dismantled mo-
tor vehicle to another person who holds a  dismantler certificate , the form furnished by the de-
partment to report the date of transfer, a description of the vehicle, the name and address  of the
[purchaser] purchasing dismantler  and other information respecting the vehicle  required by the
department.
(k) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, fails to keep the business  hidden or ade-
quately screened by the terrain or other natural objects or by plantings,  fences or other appropriate
means so  as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the highway in accordance with the
rules of the Director of Transportation. This paragraph does not apply to a business that is:
(A) Located in an area zoned for industrial use under authority of the laws of this state; or
(B) A business established before June 30, 1967.
(L) Expands or moves  any place of business approved under a dismantler certificate or opens
any additional locations for the business without obtaining a supplemental certificate under  ORS
822.125 or obtaining an additional dismantler certificate.
(m) Fails to allow the department to conduct inspections as provided under ORS 822.130.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 26
(n) Fails  to deploy or remove any air bag containing sodium azide from a vehicle before the
vehicle is wrecked or dismantled.
(o) Fails to  ensure that an air bag containing sodium azide that has been removed from a vehicle
is deployed within seven days of removal  unless the air bag is properly stored by a motor vehicle
dealer, automobile repair facility or dismantler certified under ORS 822.110.
(2) The offense described in this section, improperly conducting  a motor vehicle dismantling
business, is a:
(a) Class A misdemeanor if the person violates subsection (1)(a) to (m) of this section.
(b) Class D violation if the person violates subsection (1)(n) or (o) of this section.
(c) Class C misdemeanor, notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection,  if the person violates
subsection (1)(n) or (o) of this section and the person has two or more previous convictions for vio-
lating subsection (1)(n) or (o) of this section.
SECTION 39.
 ORS 822.137 is amended to read:
822.137. (1) As used in this section and ORS 822.135, “major component  part” includes signif-
icant parts of a motor vehicle such as engines,  short blocks, frames, transmissions, transfer cases,
cabs, doors, differentials, front or rear clips, quarter panels, truck beds or boxes, hoods, bumpers,
fenders, catalytic converters and airbags. The Department of Transportation  may by rule designate
other motor  vehicle parts not specified in this subsection as major component parts. “Major com-
ponent part” does not include cores or parts of cores that require remanufacturing or that are  lim-
ited in value to that of scrap metal.
(2) In addition  to any other penalty provided by law, the department may impose on a
dismantler, in the manner provided by ORS 183.745, a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per violation
if the dismantler:
(a) Acquires a motor  vehicle or major component part without obtaining a certificate of sale
and, if applicable, a certificate of title.
(b) Acquires a catalytic converter or a component of  a catalytic converter, that has been re-
moved from a vehicle and is offered for  sale as an independent item, separate and distinct from a
vehicle acquisition, whether individually or as part of a bundle, bale or in other bulk form.
(c) Possesses, sells  or otherwise disposes of a motor vehicle or any part of a motor vehicle
knowing that the vehicle or part has been stolen.
(d) Sells, buys, receives, conceals,  possesses or disposes of a motor vehicle or any part of a
motor vehicle having a missing, defaced, intentionally altered or  covered vehicle identification
number, unless directed to do so by a law enforcement official.
(e) Commits forgery in the  second degree, as defined in ORS 165.007, or misstates a material fact
relating to a certificate of title, registration or other document related to  a motor vehicle that has
been reassembled from parts of other motor vehicles.
(f) Fraudulently obtains, creates or modifies a dismantler certificate.
(g) Fails to maintain records at the certified place of business  for three years from the date of
acquisition of a motor vehicle that describe and identify the vehicle, including:
(A) The certificate of title number;
(B) The state where the vehicle was last registered, if applicable;
(C) The number of the last registration plate issued and the state of issuance, if applicable;
(D) The year, make and model of the vehicle;
(E) The vehicle identification number;
(F) The date acquired;
(G) The vehicle, stock or yard number assigned to the vehicle by the dismantler; and
(H) Any other information required by the department.
(h) Fails to maintain records at the certified place  of business for three years from the date of
acquisition of a major component part that describe and identify the part, including:
(A) The physical characteristics of the part;
(B) The stock or yard number assigned to the part by the dismantler;
(C) The vehicle identification number of the motor vehicle from which the part came;
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 27
(D) Transaction  documents regarding the sale or disposal of a catalytic converter, including
documents that show the transaction  date, dollar amount, stock or yard number assigned to the
catalytic converter and the signatures of buyer and seller; and
(E) Any other information required by the department.
(i) Commits a dishonest  act or omission during the sale of a motor vehicle or major component
part that, as determined by the department, causes a loss to the purchaser.
(j) Is convicted of a crime involving false statements or dishonesty that directly  relates to the
business of  the dismantler or suffers any civil judgment imposed for conduct involving fraud, mis-
representation or conversion.
(k) Fails to comply with any provision of ORS 822.133.
PLATE EXCHANGE
SECTION 40.
 ORS 805.060 is amended to read:
805.060. (1) The  Department of Transportation may issue registration plates or other evidence
of registration from any regular series rather than from any specially designed  government series
for a vehicle operated by a federal, state, county, city  or Indian tribal law enforcement, parole or
probation agency in discharging its undercover criminal investigation duties if requested to do so
by the agency. The registration period for a vehicle described  under this section shall be the same
as the regular  registration period for the type of vehicle registered. The fee for registration or re-
newal of registration of a vehicle under this section shall  be the fee established for registration or
renewal of police undercover vehicles under ORS 803.420.
(2) The Department of Transportation may enter into  agreements with agencies of other
states to provide for the reciprocal  exchange of vehicle registration plates or stickers for
use on vehicles  otherwise eligible to obtain regular series registration plates under sub-
section (1) of  this section. The department may provide registration plates or stickers of
other states obtained pursuant to this subsection to  the law enforcement, parole or pro-
bation agencies described in subsection (1) of this section. Vehicle registration plates  of
other states obtained pursuant to this subsection may be used on vehicles in place of the
vehicle registration plates issued by the department under subsection (1) of this section.
[(2)] (3)  Any vehicle registered  under this section and not exempt from the requirements to
comply with certificates of compliance for pollution control equipment  by ORS 815.300, must be
certified as complying with the requirements for pollution control equipment under ORS 815.310.
INSURANCE
SECTION 41.
 ORS 809.095 is amended to read:
809.095. (1) The Department of Transportation  may cancel the registration of, or right to apply
for registration  for, any vehicle owned by a person if the person falsely certifies compliance with
financial responsibility requirements, submits to the  department unsatisfactory proof of such com-
pliance or otherwise fails to comply with financial responsibility requirements.
[(2)] Cancellation under this [ section] subsection  shall continue until the person complies with
any applicable financial responsibility filing requirements.
(2) If the department requests that a person provide proof  of compliance with financial
responsibility requirements as authorized under  ORS 806.150, the department may suspend
the registration of, or right to apply for registration  for, a vehicle owned by a person if the
person is a registered owner of the vehicle and the person:
(a) Does not provide proof of compliance; or
(b) Provides proof of compliance  and the department determines that information con-
tained in the proof of compliance is incorrect.
(3) A suspension under subsection (2) of this section continues until:
(a) The department receives proof of compliance from the registered owner; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 28
(b) The department determines the proof of compliance is correct.
(4) The department may reinstate the registration, or right  to apply for registration for
the vehicle, if the department  determines that the vehicle is covered under a motor vehicle
liability insurance policy that meets the requirements described under ORS 806.080.
(5) If the department determines that  the person is exempt from financial responsibility
requirements, the department may reinstate the registration or right to apply  for registra-
tion.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 809.415 is amended to read:
809.415. (1)(a) The Department of Transportation shall suspend  the driving privileges of a person
who has  a judgment of the type described under ORS 806.040 rendered against the person if the
person does not settle the judgment in the manner described  under ORS 809.470 within 60 days after
its entry.
(b) A suspension under this subsection shall continue until the person does one of the following:
(A) Settles the judgment in the manner described in ORS 809.470.
(B) Has an insurer that has been found by the department to be obligated to pay the judgment,
provided that there has been no final adjudication by a court that the insurer has  no such obli-
gation.
(C) Gives  evidence to the department that a period of seven years has elapsed since the entry
of the judgment.
(D) Receives from the court that rendered the judgment  an order permitting the payment of the
judgment in installments.
(c) A person is entitled to  administrative review under ORS 809.440 of a suspension under this
subsection.
(2)[(a)] The department shall suspend the driving privileges of a  person who falsely certifies the
existence of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy  or the existence of some other means of sat-
isfying financial responsibility requirements or of a person who, after certifying the  existence of a
motor vehicle liability insurance policy or other means of satisfying  the requirements, allows the
policy to lapse or be canceled or otherwise fails to remain in  compliance with financial responsi-
bility requirements.
[(b) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department may suspend under this
subsection only if proof of compliance with financial responsibility requirements  as of the date specified
by the department by rule under ORS 806.150 is not submitted within the time specified by the  de-
partment by rule under this section. ]
[(c) A suspension under this  subsection shall continue until the person complies with future re-
sponsibility filings.]
(3)(a) The department shall suspend the driving privileges of a person who  fails to comply with
future responsibility filings whenever  required under the vehicle code or fails to provide new proof
of compliance for future responsibility filings when requested by the department.
(b) A suspension  under this subsection shall continue until the person complies with future re-
sponsibility  filings.
(c) A person whose initial obligation to make future responsibility filings is not based upon a
conviction or other action by a court is entitled to a hearing under ORS 809.440 prior  to a suspen-
sion under this subsection. A  person whose obligation to make future responsibility filings is based
upon a conviction  or other action by a court is entitled to administrative review under ORS 809.440
of a suspension under this subsection. A person whose  suspension under this subsection is based on
lapses in filing after the initial filing has been made is entitled  to administrative review under ORS
809.440.
(4)(a) The department shall suspend driving privileges when  provided under ORS 809.416. The
suspension shall continue until the earlier of the following:
(A) The person establishes to the satisfaction of the department  that the person has performed
all acts necessary under ORS 809.416 to make the person not subject to suspension.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 29
(B) Ten years from the date the  traffic offense or violation of ORS 471.430 occurred if the sus-
pension is imposed for a reason described in ORS 809.416.
(b) A person is entitled to administrative review under ORS  809.440 of a suspension under this
subsection.
(5) Upon determination by the department  that a person has committed an act that constitutes
an offense described  in ORS 809.310, the department may suspend any driving privileges or any
identification card of the person determined to have committed the  act. A suspension under this
subsection shall continue for a period of one year.
(6) Upon determination by the department that  a person has submitted false information to the
department for the purpose of establishing or maintaining  qualification to operate a commercial
motor vehicle or hold commercial driving privileges, the  department shall suspend the commercial
driving privileges or the person’s right to apply for  commercial driving privileges for a period of one
year.
SECTION 43.  ORS 806.010 is amended to read:
806.010. (1) A person commits the offense of driving uninsured if the person operates a motor
vehicle in this state on any highway or premises open to the public in this state without either:
(a) The person being insured while driving  the vehicle under a motor vehicle liability insurance
policy that meets the requirements described under ORS 806.080; or
(b) The person  or the owner of the vehicle providing the Department of Transportation with
other satisfactory proof of compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of this state.
(2) Exemptions from this section are established under ORS 806.020.
(3) In addition to other penalties under this section the following apply:
(a) A person who is involved in a motor vehicle accident at any time the person is  in violation
of this section is subject to suspension of the person’s driving privileges under ORS 809.417.
(b) A person who is convicted of violating this section is subject to ORS  806.230, if the person
does not make future responsibility filings as required by that section.
(4) A person convicted for violation of this section must file with the  department, and thereafter
maintain for a period  of [ three years ] one year , proof of financial responsibility that complies with
ORS 806.060. Failure to comply with this subsection is subject to ORS 809.415.
(5) The offense described in this section, driving uninsured, is a Class B traffic violation.
SECTION 44.
 ORS 809.417 is amended to read:
809.417. (1)(a) The Department of Transportation shall suspend  the driving privileges of a person
who fails to file an accident report required under ORS 811.725 [ or 811.730].
(b) A suspension under this subsection shall continue until the  person files the required report
or for five years from the date of suspension, whichever is sooner.
[(2) The department shall  suspend the driving privileges of any person for a period of time required
by this subsection if the person is involved  in a motor vehicle accident at any time when the department
determines the person has been operating a vehicle  in violation of ORS 806.010. A suspension under
this subsection shall be for  a period of one year except that the department shall not reinstate any
driving privileges to the person  until the person complies with future responsibility filing
requirements.]
(2)(a) If the department determines the person has been operating a  vehicle in violation
of ORS 806.010 and the person fails to make  a financial responsibility filing with the depart-
ment within 30 days after the date of the accident, the department shall suspend the person’s
driving privileges.
(b) A suspension under this subsection continues until the person complies  with future
financial responsibility filing requirements or until the filing requirement  terminates,
whichever is sooner.
(3)(a) The department may suspend the driving privileges of a person who, while operating a
motor vehicle, causes or contributes to an  accident resulting in death to any other person if the
department has reason to believe that the  person’s incompetence, recklessness, criminal negligence
or unlawful operation of the vehicle caused or contributed to the accident.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 30
(b) A suspension under this subsection shall continue for a period determined  by the department
and shall be subject to any conditions the department determines to be necessary.
(c) The department may impose an immediate suspension of driving privileges of any person
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection without hearing and without receiving a record of  the
conviction of the person of  a crime if the department has reason to believe that the person may
endanger people or property if the person’s driving privileges are not immediately  suspended. A
suspension under this paragraph is subject to a post-imposition hearing under ORS 809.440.
SECTION 45.  ORS 806.245 is amended to read:
806.245. A termination of the requirement to maintain a future responsibility filing does  not re-
move a person’s responsibility to comply with financial responsibility requirements. The Department
of Transportation shall terminate requirements for a future responsibility filing  when any of the
following occurs:
(1) The person on whose behalf the filing was made dies.
(2) More than one year has passed from the date the filing was required under ORS 806.200
or 806.230 or more than  three years have passed from the date the filing was required.
(3) A person on whose behalf the filing was made requests termination and either:
(a) The person was required to file because of an error committed by the department; or
(b) The person was required to file because of an error committed  by an insurance company in
notifying the department regarding the correctness of proof of compliance with  financial responsi-
bility requirements provided under ORS 806.150.
(4) A person who was required to file under ORS 806.150 requests termination and  the depart-
ment determines either:
(a) That the person was in fact in compliance with financial responsibility requirements as of
the date specified by the department by rule under ORS 806.150; or
(b) That the person reasonably and  in good faith believed that the person was in compliance
with financial responsibility requirements on the date specified  by the department by rule under
ORS 806.150.
(5) A person who was required  to file because of failure to prove under ORS 806.210 that the
person was in compliance with financial responsibility requirements requests termination  and the
department determines either:
(a) That the person  was in fact in compliance with financial responsibility requirements at the
time of the accident; or
(b) That the person reasonably and in good faith believed that  the person was in compliance
with financial responsibility requirements at the time of the accident.
(6) A  person’s hardship permit expires and the filing was required only for issuance of the
hardship permit under ORS 807.240.
INSURANCE
SECTION 46.
ORS 806.220 is repealed.
SECTION 47.  ORS 806.240 is amended to read:
806.240. Future responsibility filings required by ORS 806.200[ , 806.220] or 806.230 or by any
other law of this state are subject to all of the following:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the person  required to make the filing
must file with the Department of Transportation, or have filed with the department for  the benefit
of the person, proof of compliance that  meets the requirements of this section and must maintain the
proof of compliance as required under ORS 806.245. The filing is made on the  date it is received by
the department if it is received during regular business hours.
(2) The proof of compliance filed under subsection (1) of this section must be:
(a) A certificate or certificates of insurance that meet the requirements under ORS 806.270; or
(b) A valid certificate of self-insurance issued by the department under ORS 806.130.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 31
(3) The owner of  a motor vehicle may make a future responsibility filing under this section on
behalf of the owner’s employee or a member of the  owner’s immediate family or household in lieu
of the filing being made by the person. Filing under this  subsection permits the person on whose
behalf the filing is made to operate only a motor vehicle  covered by the proof of compliance given
in the filing. The department shall endorse restrictions, as appropriate, on  any license or driver
permit the person holds as the department determines necessary  to limit the person’s ability to op-
erate vehicles consistent with this subsection.
(4) Whenever proof  of compliance filed under this section no longer meets the requirements of
this section, the department shall require the furnishing of other proof of compliance for the  future
responsibility filing. If other proof of compliance is not furnished, the department shall  suspend the
driving privileges of the person as provided under ORS 809.415.
DRIVER RECORDS
SECTION 48.  ORS 802.200 is amended to read:
802.200. In addition to any other records the Department  of Transportation may establish, the
department is subject to the following provisions concerning records:
(1) The department shall maintain records  concerning the titling of vehicles in this state. The
records under this subsection shall include the following:
(a) For vehicles issued a title by this state, the records shall identify the vehicle and  contain
the following:
(A) The name  of the vehicle owner and any security interest holders in order of priority, except
that a security interest holder need not be identified if the debtor who granted the interest is  in the
business of selling vehicles and the vehicles constitute inventory held for sale;
(B) The name of any lessor of the vehicle;
(C) The vehicle description; and
(D) Whether a certificate of title was issued for the vehicle.
(b) If the vehicle is an antique vehicle that is reconstructed, the records shall indicate  that the
vehicle is reconstructed.
(c) If the vehicle is a replica, the records shall indicate that the vehicle is a replica.
(d) Any other information concerning the titling of  vehicles that the department considers con-
venient or appropriate.
(e) All odometer  disclosures and readings for a vehicle that are reported to the department un-
der provisions of the vehicle code. The department shall  keep the most recent version of records
required under this paragraph in electronic form.
(f) If the vehicle  has been reported to the department as a totaled vehicle under the provisions
of ORS 819.012 or 819.014, the records shall indicate that  the vehicle is a totaled vehicle unless the
reason for the report was theft and the vehicle has been recovered.
(2) If a vehicle that has been registered or titled in another jurisdiction  is registered or titled
in this state, the department  shall retain a record of any odometer readings shown on the title or
registration documents submitted to the department at the time of registration or title.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 826.003, the department shall maintain records  con-
cerning the registration of vehicles required to be registered by  the department. The records con-
cerning the registration of vehicles may be stored along with records concerning the  titling of
vehicles. The records under this subsection shall include the following:
(a) For vehicles registered by the department,  the records shall identify the vehicle and contain
the following:
(A) The registration plate number assigned by the department to the vehicle;
(B) The name of the vehicle owner;
(C) The vehicle description and vehicle identification number; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 32
(D) An indication that the vehicle is a totaled vehicle if it  has been reported to the department
as a totaled vehicle under the provisions of ORS 819.012 or 819.014, unless the reason for the  report
was theft and the vehicle has been recovered.
(b) Any other information concerning the registration of vehicles  that the department considers
convenient or appropriate.
(4) The department shall maintain separate records for the regulation  of vehicle dealers. The
records required under this subsection shall include the following information  about persons issued
dealer certificates:
(a) The person’s application for a vehicle dealer certificate.
(b) An alphabetical index of the name of each person applying for a vehicle dealer certificate.
(c) A numerical index according to the distinctive number assigned to each vehicle dealer.
(5) The  department shall maintain a file on vehicles for which the title record is canceled under
ORS 819.030. The records  required under this subsection shall disclose the last registered owner of
each vehicle, any security interest holder or holders and lessors of each vehicle as shown by  the
canceled title record for each vehicle and the make and year model for each vehicle.
(6) The department shall maintain a record of each agreement or declaration under  ORS 802.500
and 802.520.
(7) The  department shall maintain separate and comprehensive records of all transactions af-
fecting the Revolving Account for Emergency Cash Advances described under ORS 802.100.
(8) The department shall  maintain suitable records of driver licenses, driver permits and iden-
tification cards. The records required under this subsection shall include all of the following:
(a) An index by name and number.
(b) Supporting documentation of all driver licenses, driver permits or identification  cards issued.
(c) Every application for a driver license, driver permit or identification card.
(d) All driver licenses , [ or] driver permits  or identification cards  that have been suspended,
revoked or canceled.
(e)(A) For each driver license, driver permit or identification card, the Social  Security number
of the person  to whom the driver license, driver permit or identification card is issued or the written
statement that the person has not been assigned a Social Security number.
(B) As used in this paragraph, a “driver license,” “driver permit” or “identification card”  means
a driver license, driver permit or identification card that is not a:
(i) Real ID;
(ii) Commercial driver license; or
(iii) Commercial learner driver permit.
(f) For each commercial driver license and  commercial learner driver permit, the Social Security
number of the person to whom  the license or permit is issued, or any other number or identifying
information that the  Secretary of the United States Department of Transportation determines ap-
propriate to identify the person.
(g) For each Real ID, the Social Security number  of the person to whom the Real ID is issued,
or proof that the person is not eligible for a Social Security number.
(h) Emergency contact information provided under ORS 802.275.
(9) The Department of Transportation shall maintain a two-part driving  record consisting of an
employment driving record and a nonemployment driving record for  each person as required under
this subsection. All of the following apply to the records required under this subsection:
(a) The department shall maintain driving records [ on] for  each person the department deter-
mines requires an Oregon driving record  to comply with federal regulations or provisions of the
vehicle code. The department may establish and maintain  driving records for each person
without an Oregon driving record when the department requests or receives  information
ordinarily maintained as part of the driving record.  The department shall [ establish] adopt rules
for maintaining driving records under this subsection.
(b) In addition to other  information required by this paragraph, the employment driving record
shall include all reports of drug test results that are made to the department  under ORS 825.410 or
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 33
825.415. Notwithstanding any  other provision of law, release of the portion of the employment driv-
ing record that shows drug test results reported under ORS 825.410  or 825.415 is permitted only in
accordance with ORS 802.202. The employment driving record shall also include all  motor vehicle
accidents that the person is required to report under ORS 811.720,  all suspensions of driving privi-
leges required to be placed on the record under ORS  809.280, all suspensions of the person’s com-
mercial driving privileges that result  from operation or use of a commercial motor vehicle and all
convictions, as determined by the department by rule, of  the person for violation of motor vehicle
laws except convictions for offenses requiring mandatory revocation or  suspension of driving privi-
leges under ORS 809.409, 809.411, 809.510 to 809.545  and 813.400, but shall include only such acci-
dents, suspensions and convictions that occur while the person is driving a motor vehicle:
(A) In the course of the person’s  employment when the person is employed by another for the
principal purpose of driving a motor vehicle;
(B) Carrying persons or property for compensation;
(C) In the course of the person’s employment  in the collection, transportation or delivery of mail
if the vehicle is government owned or marked  for the collection, transportation or delivery of mail
in accordance with government rules;
(D) That is an authorized emergency vehicle;
(E) That is a commercial motor vehicle; or
(F) In the course of the person’s employment with a federal, state or  local government in a
public works project involving repair or maintenance of water, sewer or road systems.
(c) The nonemployment driving record shall include the person’s:
(A) Motor vehicle accidents that the person is required to report under ORS 811.720, other  than
the motor vehicle accidents that are included on the person’s employment driving record;
(B) Suspensions, cancellations and  revocations of driver licenses, driver permits , [ and] driving
privileges  and the right to apply for driving privileges ;
(C) Judgments and convictions, as determined by the department by rule,  for violation of the
motor vehicle  laws including, for each violation of ORS 811.100 or 811.111, the speed at which the
person was convicted of traveling and the posted speed,  the speed limit or the speed that constitutes
prima facie evidence of violation of the basic speed rule, as appropriate; and
(D) Diversion agreements entered into under ORS 813.220 within the preceding 15 years.
(d) The department may  record other entries to indicate correspondence, interviews, partic-
ipation in driver improvement programs or other matters concerning the  status of the driving priv-
ileges of the person.
(e) When the department establishes a driving record for a  person, or when  a person is
issued a driver license or driver permit by this state, the department may  request  or receive a copy
of driving records that exist for the person in any  other jurisdiction. The department shall adopt
rules specifying when the department may request  or receive  driving records from  other jurisdic-
tions and may  apply entries from [ out-of-state] the records  of other jurisdictions  for use in Oregon.
(f) When a  suspension of a driver permit, driver license or other driving privilege is placed on
the driving record  under ORS 809.280 for failure to appear in court on a traffic crime, the depart-
ment shall note on the record that the suspension was for failure to appear in  court and shall also
note the offense charged against the person on which the person failed to appear.
(g) The Department of Transportation,  in consultation with the Department of State Police, shall
devise and implement a method of noting suspensions and revocations  of driving privileges on the
record in such a way that police agencies can  determine directly from the record what class of of-
fense, as provided by law, is committed by a person  who drives in violation of the suspension or
revocation. If the Department of Transportation and the Department of State Police  devise a mutu-
ally agreeable alternative method of informing police agencies of the nature of a suspension  or re-
vocation and the consequences  of its violation, the implementation of that method shall satisfy the
duty of the Department of Transportation under this paragraph.
(10) The department  shall maintain accident reports filed with the department under ORS
810.460 and 811.725 to 811.735.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 34
(11) The department shall maintain records of bank  checks or money orders returned under ORS
802.110.
(12) The department shall maintain records of trip permits  issued by the department under ORS
803.600, as  provided under this subsection. The records required by this subsection shall include the
following:
(a) A description of the vehicle sufficient to identify the vehicle.
(b) The person to whom the permit was issued.
(c) When the permit was issued.
(d) The type of permit issued.
(e) For registration  weight trip permits, the maximum allowable registration weight permitted
for operation under the permit.
(f) Any other information the department determines appropriate or convenient.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 802.220 is amended to read:
802.220. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and ORS 802.177, the  records the
Department of Transportation maintains under ORS 802.200  on vehicles are public records. The re-
cords of vehicles registered under ORS 805.060 are not public records and  are exempt from public
inspection as provided under ORS 181A.220 and are for the confidential use of criminal justice
agencies described under ORS 181A.010. The department may  charge the fee established under ORS
802.230 for furnishing information under this section concerning a vehicle or its owner.
(2) The department may charge the fee established under  ORS 802.230 for furnishing to the
public information from the records the department maintains under ORS  802.200 concerning driver
licenses or driver permits.
(3) The records the department keeps under ORS 802.200 on  judgments or convictions under
ORS 810.375 shall be open to the inspection of any person during reasonable business hours. Nothing
in this subsection authorizes the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
(4) The department shall upon request furnish any person certified abstracts of the  employment
driving record and the nonemployment driving record of any  person whose driving records are
maintained under ORS 802.200. If an abstract of the employment driving record  is not specifically
requested, the department shall only furnish an abstract of the nonemployment  driving record.
Nothing in this subsection authorizes  the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
The department shall collect the fee established  for abstracts of driving records under ORS 802.230.
A certified abstract issued under this section shall not contain any  of the following, unless the ab-
stract is being requested under ORS 746.265 (3):
(a) Any accident or conviction for violation  of motor vehicles laws that occurred more than
three years immediately preceding a request for abstract.
(b) Any suspension ordered  under ORS 809.220 after the department has received notice to
reinstate a person’s suspended driving privileges under ORS 809.220.
(c) Any  diversion agreement under ORS 813.220 entered into more than three years immediately
preceding a request for the abstract.
(5) Except  as otherwise provided in this subsection, accident reports filed with the department
under ORS 811.725, 811.730 or 811.735 shall be without prejudice  to the individual filing the report
and shall be  for the confidential use of state administrative and enforcement agencies. The depart-
ment may use the confidential accident reports to  provide the following information to the persons
described:
(a) Upon request, the department shall disclose the following information to any party  involved
in the accident or to their personal representative or any member of the family of a party  involved
in the accident:
(A) The identity of the owner, driver, occupants and the registration number of  a vehicle in-
volved in the accident;
(B) The names of any companies insuring the owner or  driver of a vehicle involved in the ac-
cident; and
(C) The names of any witnesses to the accident.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 35
(b) The department shall furnish  a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or
has not been made to the department upon demand  of any person who has or claims to have made
such a report or upon demand of a court.
(6) The  department may furnish a driving record maintained by the department under
ORS 802.200 to another jurisdiction upon request of the other jurisdiction.
[(6)] (7)  The department  shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports to develop statis-
tical information based  thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents. The de-
partment shall publish information compiled under this section in the manner  provided under ORS
802.050.
[(7)] (8) Except as otherwise provided in  this subsection, the records the department is required
under ORS 802.200 to maintain on  trip permits issued under ORS 803.600 are public records. The
department may charge  a fee established under ORS 802.230 for furnishing information from the
records on trip permits. Nothing  in this subsection authorizes the release of personal information
as defined in ORS 802.175.
[(8)] (9) The records the department maintains under ORS 802.200  concerning odometer readings
for vehicles are public records. The department may separately  furnish information concerning
odometer readings shown by its records.  The department may charge the fee established under ORS
802.230 for information separately provided under this subsection. Nothing  in this subsection au-
thorizes the release of personal information as defined in ORS 802.175.
COMMERCIAL DRIVING PRIVILEGES
SECTION 50.  ORS 809.520 is amended to read:
809.520. (1) [Notwithstanding ORS 809.510  (1) to (5) and (7), ] The Department of Transportation
shall permanently suspend a person’s  commercial driving privileges for the lifetime of the person if
the department receives a record of conviction for a crime punishable as  a felony in which a motor
vehicle was used and that  involved the manufacturing, distributing or dispensing of a controlled
substance, as defined in ORS 475.005. The department may not  reinstate commercial driving privi-
leges of a person whose commercial driving privileges are suspended under this subsection.
(2) [Notwithstanding ORS 809.510  (1) to (5) and (7), ] The department shall permanently suspend
a person’s commercial driving privileges for the lifetime of  the person if the department receives a
record of conviction for a crime in which a commercial motor  vehicle was used and that involved
an act or practice of severe forms of trafficking in persons as defined by the department by  rule.
The department may not reinstate commercial driving privileges of  a person whose commercial
driving privileges are suspended under this subsection.
(3)(a) [ Notwithstanding ORS 809.510 (1) to  (5) and (7), ] The department shall suspend a person’s
commercial  driving  privileges for the lifetime of the person if the department receives a second or
subsequent record, report or notice described  in ORS 809.510 [ (1) to (5) and (7) ] that does not arise
out of the same incident and that would be grounds for suspension of the person’s  commercial
driving privileges under ORS 809.510 [ (1) to (5) and (7) ].
(b) The department may adopt  rules providing for the reinstatement of commercial driving
privileges suspended under this subsection. The  department may not reinstate commercial driving
privileges [ privilege suspensions ] under this subsection earlier than 10 years  after the date that the
person’s commercial driving privileges are suspended under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The  department shall permanently suspend a person’s commercial driving privileges for the
lifetime of the person if the department receives a record, report or notice described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection that relates to conduct that occurred  after the person’s commercial driving
privileges were reinstated under  paragraph (b) of this subsection. The department may not reinstate
the commercial driving  privileges of a person whose commercial driving privileges are suspended
under this paragraph.
(4) The department shall suspend a person’s commercial driving privileges  under this
section if the department receives a notice of  a conviction in another jurisdiction of an of-
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 36
fense that, if committed in this state, would be grounds for suspending the  person’s com-
mercial driving privileges under this section. The department’s authority to reinstate  a
person’s commercial driving privileges under this section is  the same as if the conviction
were for an offense committed in this  state. For the purposes of this subsection,
“conviction” has the meaning given that term in ORS 809.510 (6).
[(4)] (5) A suspension imposed under this section is consecutive  to any other suspension imposed
under ORS 809.510, 809.525, 809.530 or 809.535, if the suspensions do  not arise out of the same in-
cident.
TEMPORARY REGISTRATION PERMITS
SECTION 51.  ORS 803.350 is amended to read:
803.350. This section establishes  the requirements for qualification for registration. The De-
partment of Transportation may not issue registration to a vehicle if the requirements  under this
section are not met.  The department, in the absence of just cause for refusing to register a vehicle
upon application, shall assign a distinctive number or other distinctive means of identification and
shall issue registration for a vehicle if all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The applicant applies for and  is granted title in the applicant’s name at the same time the
person makes application for registration, or presents  satisfactory evidence that title covering the
vehicle has been previously issued to the applicant.
(2) The applicant completes an application described under ORS 803.370. If the vehicle is a  re-
constructed or assembled vehicle or a replica, the person must indicate that fact in  the application
or be subject to ORS 803.225.
(3) The  applicant pays the department the registration fee established under ORS 803.420 and
803.422 and any applicable fees for issuance of registration plates.
(4) For motor vehicles, proof of compliance  with pollution control equipment requirements is
provided to the department  before the department issues stickers, registration and
plates. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a vehicle dealer from issuing a  temporary regis-
tration permit for a vehicle that does  not have proof of compliance at the time the vehicle
is sold. The dealer shall provide the purchaser  with a written notice as prescribed in ORS
803.625. Proof required to comply with this subsection is described under ORS 815.310. This sub-
section does not apply if the vehicle is exempt from  the requirements for proof of compliance under
ORS 815.300.
(5) The applicant is domiciled in this state, as described in ORS 803.355, if  required by ORS
803.360 to be domiciled in the state in order to register a vehicle. If the  department has reason to
believe that the applicant is not domiciled in this state and is required to be in  order to register a
vehicle, the department may require the person to submit proof of domicile. The  department shall
determine by rule what constitutes proof of domicile.
(6) The  applicant owns a vehicle that qualifies under ORS 803.360 (2) for registration in this
state, if the  owner is not domiciled in this state and is not required by ORS 803.200, or any other
provision of law, to register the vehicle in this state.
(7) The applicant surrenders all evidence of any former  registration or title as required by ORS
803.380.
(8)(a) Beginning with 2009 model year new motor vehicles, the applicant provides  proof of com-
pliance with low emission motor vehicle standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360. The depart-
ment shall determine by rule what constitutes proof of compliance with low emission motor vehicle
standards.
(b) The department shall determine by rule which new motor vehicles are exempt from  the re-
quirements of this subsection. Any rules adopted pursuant to  this paragraph shall be consistent with
the Environmental Quality Commission standards adopted pursuant to ORS 468A.360.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 37
(c) For purposes of this subsection, “new motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle with 7,500 miles
or less  on the odometer when the vehicle is initially registered under ORS 803.420 (6)(a), 805.100,
805.110 or 805.120.
(9) If required to do  so by the department, the applicant provides the department with satisfac-
tory proof that the vehicle was designed to be operated  on highways and meets equipment require-
ments imposed by statute or  rule for the lawful operation of a vehicle on highways. The department
may adopt rules specifying the kinds of  vehicles that are subject to this subsection and what con-
stitutes satisfactory proof under this subsection.
SECTION 52.  ORS 803.625 is amended to read:
803.625. (1) The holder of a current, valid vehicle dealer certificate issued under ORS  822.020
may issue temporary  registration  permits for the operation of vehicles or  the transporting of a
camper pending the receipt of permanent registration from the Department of Transportation.
(2) Forms for temporary registration permits issued under this section shall be furnished and,
subject to ORS 803.640, prescribed by the department.
(3) A vehicle dealer may issue a temporary registration permit  for a motor vehicle being
sold that is subject to the pollution control equipment requirements under ORS 815.295 and
does not have proof of compliance with the requirements. The dealer shall provide the pur-
chaser of the vehicle with a written notice  along with the temporary registration permit.
The notice must inform the purchaser of the following:
(a) The vehicle  is subject to the pollution control equipment requirements under ORS
815.295;
(b) The purchaser is required  to comply with ORS 815.295 before the temporary regis-
tration permit expires or the purchaser will be required to reapply to register the vehicle;
(c) The vehicle may not be registered in this state  unless proof of compliance with pol-
lution control equipment requirements is provided to the department;
(d) The  purchaser agrees to immediately notify the vehicle dealer if the vehicle does not
pass testing and is not issued proof of compliance under ORS 815.310;
(e) The vehicle dealer is required to ensure the vehicle complies with the pollution  con-
trol equipment requirements; and
(f) After the requirement described in paragraph  (e) of this subsection is satisfied, the
vehicle dealer is not  obligated to ensure the vehicle complies with future testing require-
ments.
[(3)] (4) The department shall specify, by rule, the procedures to be followed by persons  issuing
and using temporary  registration  permits  issued under this section. Persons violating rules estab-
lished by the department under this subsection are subject  to penalty under ORS 803.630 and
803.635.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 53.
The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 38
Passed by Senate May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 840 (SB 840-A) Page 39